Article   Type:CSO 

  [Text] The formation of a new type of 
relations--nonconfrontational, 
democratic, partnership relations--among states is one of the 
main distinguishing features of world development following the 
end of the almost half-century "cold war." This process is 
complex, many-sided and contradictory, but its chief vector 
becomes more and more obvious: it is toward interworking, 
coordination and unification of efforts and toward integration 
and cooperation. 
  This also applies fully to the military-political area. 
There 
is a profound dialectical link among national, regional and 
global security that is clearly confirmed by today's political 
realities. The threat of global nuclear war has been 
substantially diminished and put aside. The world unquestionably 
gained from this, but has it been delivered from military 
danger? Unfortunately not. Regional confrontation came to 
replace global confrontation. There has been a sharp increase in 
the number of crises, local wars and armed conflicts. Their 
number exceeds 60 today, and Europe takes first place in the 
proportion of conflicts in overall statistics. But the fact is, 
just a few years ago there was not one armed conflict here. 
  Such was the natural harvest resulting from planting of a 
sovereignization raised to the absolute and often acquiring the 
form of nationalism. If one turns to contemporary Europe, for 
example, it is impossible not to see that European integration 
has slowed seriously. The European community (as well as the 
entire world community, by the way) encountered new sources of 
tension and ended up facing the real danger of slipping down to 
a catastrophe which has fully discernible features. 
  It is war in Yugoslavia, into which an ever growing number 
of 
states is being drawn in one way or another. 
  It is enormous arsenals of weapons, including nuclear 
weapons, whose nonproliferation is becoming an ever greater and 
ever more troubling question. 
  It is instability in new independent states of Eastern and 
Central Europe, stricken by protracted economic crisis. 
  It is centers of conflict which have a tendency to escalate 
in various areas of the former USSR, both in CIS states as well 
as near their borders. 
  It is the attempts by certain states to satisfy their 
political ambitions in one way or another by filling the power 
vacuum formed in northern Eurasia as a result of disintegration 
of the USSR, and it is much more. 
  A situation has taken shape in which national interests of 
many states turn out to be affected throughout the spectrum of 
mutual relations, including interests of security and stability. 
And a civilized solution to it is possible only on the path of a 
joint, coordinated political solution to vital 
problems, both those inherited from the past as well as those 
newly arisen, i.e., on the path of consolidation based on trust, 
mutual understanding, equality and civilized partnership. 
  All states must be included in this choice. Selecting them 
according to the principle of political conjuncture or, even 
worse, according to "cold war" cliches and stereotypes is 
dangerously short-sighted. 
  Of course, directing attention only to the remaining "power 
structures" of NATO or the Western European Union [WEU] and 
relying on other similar organizations of western states can 
lead to certain, albeit temporary, progress. On the whole, 
however, that approach is incapable of solving the problem of 
forming a new model of a safe, stable world. Moreover, excluding 
new independent states from the integration process and 
isolating either some of them or particular groups of states and 
arbitrarily narrowing the military-strategic "security space" is 
capable of leading to the mothballing and subsequent 
reproduction of potential sources of tension and instability in 
a certain situation. 
  In other words, under contemporary conditions collective 
security becomes not simply a demand of life, but also a kind of 
international obligation which states voluntarily assume for the 
sake of their own interests and universal peace. And if we are 
speaking about Russia and other CIS member states, the chief 
guarantee of national security of each Commonwealth state 
individually and of all of them together specifically is an 
effective system of their collective security coupled integrally 
with the European and world systems. In addition, cemented by 
Russia and covered by its "nuclear umbrella," such a system can 
and must be that very Eurasian power center which acts as a very 
important guarantor of balance and stability of the regional and 
worldwide security space. 
  Ways of establishing such a system were outlined in the CIS 
Charter, the Tashkent Collective Security Treaty, the concept of 
military security of Commonwealth member states, and other 
military-political documents adopted in the CIS. Naturally, all 
activity in the military-political area depends directly on 
interfacing the economic and financial structures of CIS states 
and on the formation and strengthening of their economic 
alliance. The political will to establish such an alliance is 
becoming more and more pronounced in the majority of 
Commonwealth states. Formation of the Commonwealth 
Coordination-Consultative Committee and Executive Secretariat 
substantially strengthens national economic ties. 
  It is understandable that the CIS collective security system 
can be effective only if it is based not on declarations, but on 
real involvement of independent states in its 
functioning. 
  This is why joint development of the mechanism for 
implementing the Collective Security Treaty of CIS member states 
and their taking specific, coordinated steps to materialize the 
sum total of military-political agreements in the Commonwealth 
are fundamentally important. Figuratively speaking, the 
principal "gears" of such a mechanism are the interstate bodies 
for coordination and interworking and the armed forces of 
independent Commonwealth states. The work of forming general 
approaches to the creation and coordinated functioning of such 
"gears" demands self-restraint, patience, political 
responsibility and farsightedness. The military-technical 
cooperation of Commonwealth states and continuance or 
restoration of cooperative ties in the defense industry on a 
qualitatively new basis, possibly with establishment of 
interstate corporations for arms and military equipment 
production in the CIS, are of special, basic importance for 
successful organizational development of national armed forces 
and for military-political integration on the whole. 
  Along with this "external" function, conditionally speaking, 
the CIS collective security system also has an "internal" 
function. A number of major conflicts are permanently developing 
in geographic space of the former USSR: in the Transcaucasus, 
North Caucasus, Dniester region, and Central Asia. The 
appearance of new centers in other areas is possible. 
  Paramilitary bandit forces, "army surrogates," criminal 
clans, criminal groups, and outside military assistance all are 
factors currently in force that threaten the national security 
of Commonwealth countries. CIS states cannot be allowed to 
become hostages of "small wars," international terrorism, armed 
subversion and crime, and along with this a source of European 
and world instability. 
  A new generation of people brought up on the smell of 
powder, 
on blood, and on the blind, dangerous delusion that only the 
language of force is capable of resolving all conflicts is 
beginning to form on this soil. In recent years armed units for 
which war becomes the source of life appeared in many regions. 
  An analysis of modern armed conflicts and their sources, 
course and outcome shows that there is not nor can there be a 
reasonable alternative to their world political settlement. Take 
the Abkhazian-Georgian conflict for example. If we imagine that 
Georgia will win a military victory in this conflict, then 
representatives of Russia's mountain-dwelling peoples and Abkhaz 
volunteers from Turkey will come to Abkhazia's help, and this 
signifies an escalation of the conflict and the drawing of new 
states and peoples into it with obvious consequences for 
regional and universal peace. But if Abkhazia wins a military 
victory, then Georgia will turn to other states for military 
assistance, and such states will be found. Consequently, there 
is again an escalation of the conflict and its development into 
war, and again blood, tears, sufferings and destruction. 
  Unfortunately, there are forces not only within but also 
outside the CIS which are not interested in localizing and 
stopping these conflicts and which are pushing peoples of the 
CIS toward disintegration and a redivision of territory and 
property, which means toward confrontation, internal 
militarization, exhaustion of resources and inevitable collapse. 
  Such logic contradicts common sense and the vital interests 
of peoples. 
  It seems to me that our time must give birth to politicians 
of the future whose distinguishing features would be their 
ability to solve all problems by peaceful means, naturally, 
without detriment to the interests of their own state and their 
own people, since even the most brilliant victory in war is 
nothing compared with victory in the struggle to bar 
and prevent war. 
  The formation and consistent implementation of a coordinated 
peacemaking policy within the framework of Commonwealth 
collective security are becoming increasingly urgent in view of 
the fact that conflicts on CIS territory are becoming protracted 
and insistently demand development of a joint policy, including 
a prophylactic, "preventive" policy for preventing them and for 
restoring and keeping the peace. Only Russia is fully involved 
in the sphere of peacemaking policy for now, and in the process 
it is suffering not only material costs, but also moral and 
political losses difficult to recoup from 
accusations--absolutely unfair and often simply speculative and 
provocative--of "imperial" intentions and objectives. This is 
why the need for active involvement of all states parties to the 
Collective Security Treaty in preventing and stopping crises and 
conflicts arising on the territory or borders of CIS states 
becomes more and more urgent. The need for forming contingents 
of peacemaking forces on a multinational basis so that subunits 
of armies of all member states operate in them under CIS mandate 
is no less obvious. 
  And in view of the specific historical character and 
traditions of peoples living here, it is possible to use 
collective peacemaking forces exclusively of the Commonwealth 
for peacemaking operations in the CIS geostrategic space--of 
course, under the procedure specified by the UN Charter and with 
notification of the United Nations. 
  It is impossible not to see that NATO is using its armed 
forces as peacemaking forces more and more often in striving to 
become the guarantor of world stability. In this connection it 
appears fundamentally important that neither NATO nor any other 
military-political blocs perform peacemaking missions, but 
specifically UN troops, of which military contingents of CIS 
states already are a part. To this end it is necessary to 
strengthen the UN military structure and grant it the right to 
organize and coordinate the training of troops assigned to 
international peacemaking forces and to accomplish their unified 
outfitting and support. 
  An extremely important military-political aspect of the 
dialectics of national and collective security of Commonwealth 
states involves the strategic nuclear forces inherited from the 
USSR. The specific nature of the situation is that these forces 
unquestionably must have state affiliation. There is no doubt at 
all that such state affiliation can and must be only Russian, 
inasmuch as it is Russia that is the sole successor to the 
USSR's nuclear status and to the nuclear missile component of 
its Armed Forces. 
  Punctual fulfillment of the START I Treaty and Lisbon 
Protocol, which already have been ratified by all states parties 
with the exception of Ukraine, is a fundamental condition for 
ensuring security not only in the Commonwealth, but also in 
Europe and throughout the world as well. The perpetuation and 
strengthening of such cornerstones of contemporary peace and 
universal security as nonproliferation of nuclear and other 
kinds of mass destruction weapons are connected with this in 
particular. 
  The future transition of Commonwealth countries to be under 
Russia's "nuclear umbrella" is a guarantee of regional and 
worldwide stability and of reliability and effectiveness in 
ensuring their national security. 
  All experience of mankind's history and the struggle for 
social progress, security and peace bear witness that peoples' 
unity, interworking and cooperation in resolving problems that 
arise are in their interests. Further deepening of reforms on 
the path to democracy and a rule-of-law state directly depends 
on unification of states' efforts in joint work of maintaining 
security and peace. 
  The future belongs to ever deeper, more comprehensive 
integration based on equality, mutual understanding, trust and 
good-neighbor relations. 
  [Signed] YE. I. SHAPOSHNIKOV 
  19 May 1993 
<H5>  Part 1 - Defense and Security in the Contemporary World </H5>
  Abrupt changes in contemporary international relations, 
spasmodic development of events, and the appearance of trends 
impossible to foresee in the recent past all indicate that human 
civilization is at a critical stage in its evolution. The world 
system which formed after the end of World War II is giving way 
to a new configuration of international relations. 
  Are the role and importance of defense and assurance of 
security changing in the new situation? What is advantageous for 
states--separate actions in the security area or a search for 
ways to unite efforts and integrate actions? Should CIS members 
be oriented toward independence in the defense area or follow a 
path of cooperation in the military area in their interests? 
These questions can be answered only after a thorough analysis 
of factors determining the development of contemporary 
international relations and of military-political relations as a 
part of them. 
<H5>  1.1. Forming a New World Order </H5>
  In the 40 years since World War II the nature of relations 
among states was determined by the existence of two opposing 
systems headed by the USSR and United States, by the 
predominance of a confrontational nature in their mutual 
relations, and by each one's reliance above all on military 
force in policy with respect to each other. It is important to 
remember here not only the global East-West confrontation, but 
also the complex knot of North-South contradictions and the 
numerous regional contradictions which often developed into open 
conflicts. 
  On the whole, four groups of countries stood out from the 
standpoint of aggregate force capabilities for achieving their 
goals: superpowers which headed opposing blocs; great 
powers--permanent members of the UN Security Council--which 
influenced the world community; medium states capable of 
affecting the development of a situation in individual regions; 
and small countries which had an insignificant influence on 
international relations. 
  Ruling circles of states both of East as well as West 
perceived the world in the "cold war" period as follows: 

  -  ideological struggle of the two systems was viewed as a 
mortal clash until total destruction of the opposing side; 
  -  the United States and USSR as countries heading opposing 
systems realized that their territories were vulnerable to 
nuclear strikes which could be prevented only by following a 
deterrence policy; 
  -  ensuring viability of their allies and friendly regimes in 
various regions of the world was considered a very important 
aspect of U.S. and USSR policy; 
  -  both sides viewed an armed conflict in Europe as the main 
military danger. 

    The world is entering a period of transition from 
confrontation of the bipolar "East-West" structure to new 
international relations and to a new global community, which 
open up great opportunities for constructive international 
cooperation and settlement of issues and conflicts by political 
means. 
  Rid of the constant presence of the threat of global nuclear 
catastrophe, the cardinally changing geopolitical picture of the 
world nevertheless still does not permit letting up attention to 
security problems. 
  Disintegration of the Warsaw Pact Organization and USSR and 
disappearance of the ideological watershed between East and West 
cardinally changed the disposition of forces which took shape in 
the "cold war" period and lent impetus to development of 
qualitatively new processes. The question of confrontation of 
polar systems, socialist and capitalist, concentrated around two 
superpowers, the USSR and United States, became a thing of the 
past. The process connected with rejection of total structures 
and restoration of normal market relationships essentially 
embraced the entire former system of socialism, although it is 
proceeding at a different rate and with great originality in 
each individual country. This process gave rise to deep-seated 
changes in a number of international structures which had formed 
and which had supported the East-West confrontation. Above all 
this was the disintegration of the Warsaw Pact Organization, 
already mentioned, and the withdrawal of Soviet Armed Forces 
from the territory of Czechoslovakia, Hungary, Poland, and in 
the near future also Germany. Changes are occurring both in 
functions and structure of NATO in the direction of 
transformation from a military-political to a political-military 
organization. The numerical strength of armed forces of NATO 
countries stationed in the Central European theater is being 
reduced and U.S. military presence in various areas of the world 
is diminishing. 
  The very essence and political content of the "superpower" 
concept are undergoing modification. Historically it was 
associated with possession of nuclear weapons, unlimited 
economic capacities and claims to representing the model of 
mankind's future. Fifteen independent states formed in place of 
one of the superpowers, the USSR (Diagram 1). 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-005LC-05A>           Diagram 1. States which formed </FIG>





    Possessing mass destruction weapons as the successor to the 
USSR's nuclear status, Russia continues to be the only 
post-Soviet republic which could claim the role of superpower, 
but after a little over 70 years of building socialism, Russia 
rejected claims to the role of being a model of social order for 
all mankind. Russian society is being transformed into a 
socioeconomic system based on market relations and on a 
democratic state system. The crisis being experienced by Russia 
is of such depth and scale that it does not allow counting on 
obtaining sufficiently tangible socioeconomic results at the 
very least for the life of one generation. 
  With respect to the United States, it gradually finds itself 
in a situation where other countries are emerging from U.S. 
control more and more confidently and prefer to be guided in 
their affairs by their own national interests. In addition, the 
United States often simply cannot behave as a superpower because 
a number of countries have acquired economic capacities 
comparable with U.S. capacities, which makes U.S. advantages 
more and more relative. At the same time, while losing many of 
the attributes of a superpower, the United States obviously 
still will remain a world leader in all spheres--political, 
economic and military--for a long time. In the early 1990's U.S. 
gross national product [GNP] exceeded $5.5 billion, which is 15 
percent greater than the GNP's of Germany, France, Great Britain 
and Italy together and almost double the GNP of Japan. In the 
latter half of the 1980's U.S. GNP increased an average of 2.8 
percent annually in real terms with an inflation rate of 3.5 
percent. At the same time, productivity in the business sphere, 
including energy sectors and the private sector, grew by no more 
than 0.5 percent annually during the 1980's. 
  The gradual disappearance of superpowers from the political 
arena and their narrowing capabilities for balancing the world 
situation are accompanied by an expansion in the ranks of great 
powers. The capability of exerting global influence is building 
up for the latter above all because of economic capacities. In 
this connection the "economic weight" of states is acquiring 
great importance in global and regional terms. 
  Japan, whose economy is characterized by continuance of 
outstripping development rates compared with the United States 
and principal Western European countries, is moving to leading 
roles as an economic power center. Another distinguishing 
feature of the Japanese economy is the significantly lower 
inflation level compared with these countries. In the latter 
half of the 1980's the average annual growth rate of Japan's GNP 
was 4.2 percent, that of inflation was 1.8 percent, and business 
productivity grew an average of 3 percent per year in the 
1980's. This permits saying that Japan is catching up with the 
United States. 
  The influence of Germany is growing most among European 
countries, which to a considerable extent is connected with 
unification of the FRG and GDR as a single state. The GNP of 
unified Germany is around three-fourths of the aggregate GNP of 
France and Great Britain. The FRG's economic growth rates in 
real terms have averaged 3.2 percent annually since the 
mid-1980's, that of inflation 2.5 percent, and business 
productivity grew by 1.6 percent annually in this period. Entry 
into force of the Maastricht Agreements signed in December 1991 
will permit Germany to strengthen its position considerably not 
only in Western but also in Eastern Europe as well as in the 
world as a whole. 
  In the future, economic balance among the most influential 
countries in the world will change against a background of 
increasing "economic weight" of medium-rank countries, basically 
from among developing states. These are such countries as India, 
Saudi Arabia, Brazil, Argentina and a number of others. On the 
whole the absence of two opposing world systems forces a 
different look at developing countries: this no longer is a 
"third world" seeking its path between two global geopolitical 
blocs. 
  A reduced level of political confrontation from a global 
aspect does not mean such trends will predominate at a regional 
or local level. Experience already shows both a sharp 
intensification of conflict in relationships between individual 
countries as well as a growth in capabilities of small and 
medium states to influence the policy of great powers and the 
world situation. 
  Along with the positive phenomena and trends, fundamental 
changes in the picture of the contemporary world also called to 
life negative ones, above all of a nationalistic, disintegrative 
nature. The threat to the cause of security and peace that is 
coupled with them urgently demands barring the destructive 
development of events and ensuring a smooth, evolutionary 
transition of the international relations system that has formed 
to a qualitatively new state. 
  The solution to this problem presumes finding optimum ways 
to 
harmonize the process of changes. Far from last place among them 
is occupied by formation of a global security system and its 
component, a CIS collective security system. Such a system could 
provide each of its members greater capabilities compared with a 
situation in which any one country acted on an individual basis. 
As a result Commonwealth states would make their contribution 
toward overcoming consequences of the destruction of the balance 
of forces which existed in the world and toward ensuring 
international stability. 
<H5>  1.2. Intensification of Cultural-Ethnic Contradictions </H5>
  With discontinuance of global confrontation on a 
class-ideological basis along the East and West axis, the 
influence of cultural-ethnic contradictions and geopolitical, 
national and confessional problems connected with them on 
security both in the world as a whole as well as in individual 
regions sharply intensified. The sources of these contradictions 
lie in the fact that mankind consists of ethnic 
communities--cultural-historical formations having a common 
culture and occupying a certain geographic territory that often 
does not coincide with state boundaries. The culture of some 
ethnic communities, above all its political component reflecting 
the aggregate of views on goals and tasks and on relations with 
the surrounding world, can enter into contradiction with the 
culture of other communities and thereby generate tension. This 
can be compensated by a system of good-neighbor relations and 
not be manifested in any kind of extreme forms for decades. But 
a change in priorities, goals and tasks of development of ethnic 
communities can catalyze contradictions and destabilize the 
situation. 
  The most important processes from this standpoint are 
occurring in the United States, Western and Eastern Europe, the 
Asiatic-Pacific region and a number of other countries and 
regions of the world. 
  During the more than 200 years of its existence the 
United States of America passed through several 
stages of development. The stage which began with the arrival of 
President F. Roosevelt in power presently is coming to a close. 
It was characterized by the consensus which formed in American 
society over the understanding that the primary danger to 
America threatened from outside. The Vietnam war undermined the 
American people's faith in the need to support the "global 
deterrence" policy being followed by the federal government, and 
disintegration of the USSR essentially nullified it. The shift 
of main attention to the country's domestic problems stands out 
more and more in relief for the United States. 
  On a socioeconomic plane, by the beginning of the 1990's 
ideas of conservatism which did not lead to a growth in American 
society's well-being when implemented by the Reagan and Bush 
administrations lost attractiveness both for the U.S. population 
as well as for a number of other countries. 
  U.S. national strategy following World War II was aimed at 
preserving and strengthening positions as the military, 
economic, political and ideological leader of the West in 
confrontation with the USSR above all. The change in the 
situation and the trend toward replacing a bipolar system of 
international relations with a multipolar system raises the 
question of choosing a new approach. A process of rethinking 
foreign policy priorities presently is going on in the United 
States. Two points capable of negatively affecting development 
of the international situation draw attention. 
  First of all, it is an assessment of results of the end of 
the "cold war" as a victory of the West, above all the United 
States. The conclusion is drawn that as a result the United 
States remains the only superpower and is predestined almost by 
fate itself to govern the world. Practical actions of the U.S. 
leadership in 1992 confirm that such a way of thinking has 
influential proponents; however, it appears that long-term and 
not conjunctural, momentary U.S. interests demand a weighed 
assessment that involves modern realities and prospects of 
global development under the new conditions. 
  Secondly, it is the attempts to reanimate an essentially 
colonialist approach to solving world problems. Advancement of 
the thesis of the advisability of creating a club of rich, 
civilized countries capable of "governing" mankind became a kind 
of reaction to the decreased capabilities in a multipolar 
structure of international relations for safeguarding interests 
of the United States and a number of states of Western Europe 
essentially at the expense of the rest of the world. Efforts to 
realize this thesis are capable of causing a split in the world 
community and an escalation of international tension. 
  These points possibly will not develop. This will ease the 
work of maintaining stability and creating an effective 
international security system, but even in the given instance 
evidently one should proceed from the fact that U.S. national 
strategy will be aimed at maximum preservation of predominant 
positions in the world. While giving more attention to economic 
well-being in the United States itself, the country's leadership 
will strive to use multilateral organizations such as NATO more 
actively in American interests. But under certain conditions 
such a direction of actions essentially can become close to or 
even similar to the idea of forming a club of rich states. 
  In Europe two differing cultural-historical 
communities--Western European and Eastern European--coexist. 
Their development is characterized by opposite trends. 
  A process of transition from an authoritarian 
political-economic system to a pluralistic system is occurring 
in Eastern Europe. Disintegration of the soviet-centrist system 
which existed in the region is breaking the stable structure of 
foreign-policy interaction of countries located here and giving 
it a transitional nature. This circumstance is superimposed on 
internal instability, which creates a field of potential 
conflict in the region. 
  The developing situation increases the possibility of 
frictions and conflicts, especially among countries with 
national-territorial claims (Albania-Yugoslavia, 
Greece-Bulgaria, Hungary-Yugoslavia, Hungary-Romania, 
Hungary-Slovakia, Bulgaria-Turkey, Bulgaria-Romania). 
  The course and outcome of the war in Yugoslavia are of 
special importance for prospects of Eastern Europe's 
development. The sequence of mutually generated national-state 
conflicts and attempts at recarving the European map strengthen 
fears of this region's "Balkanization." On the whole, the trend 
toward formation of national states in Eastern Europe was given 
powerful impetus and evidently will be determining for 
cultural-historical development for the foreseeable period. 
  The processes occurring in Western Europe contribute to 
creating a region unified in cultural-historical terms and to 
identifying the population as inhabitants of a unified 
continent. Development of the European Economic Community became 
the chief factor which led to this process in the last decade. 
  The Maastricht Agreements created a basis on which a unified 
European government can be formed and a common foreign and 
military policy developed. The presence of a European market 
will have a very strong effect on forms and methods of economic 
and other relationships of Western Europe with other regions of 
the world, since each country will be interested in the strong 
positions of other European countries. 
  Western European independence in the future presumes 
creation 
of its own security system and realization of its own military 
policy. Four interrelated directions are being used in this 
connection: 

  -  bilateral cooperation; 
  -  use of European Community [EC] bodies to deepen military 
integration; 
  -  strengthening of WEU influence in development of 
foreign and military policy; 
  -  use of NATO as a ready-made 
command structure. 

    The perceptible strengthening of ties between Paris and Bonn 
gives very strong impetus to Western European cooperation in the 
military area. The Franco-German initiative on deploying a joint 
corps in France based on the Franco-German brigade opens up the 
path to practical progress toward an independent European 
defense. 
  In the future, confrontation may grow stronger between 
proponents of a European and an Atlantic security model. 
Establishment of a European Community common market in 1993 and 
acceleration of Western European integration in all directions, 
total withdrawal of Russian troops from Germany in 1994 with a 
simultaneous significant reduction in U.S. military presence on 
the European continent, the reduction in numerical strength of 
NATO Armed Forces by the mid-1990's and the beginning of their 
restructuring, and the reduction in the number of nuclear 
weapons in Europe speak in favor of this. An increasingly 
independent military-political unification west of the borders 
of Commonwealth states may show up distinctly as a result. 
  The national strategy of Japan following World War 
II was dictated at first by the need to adapt to the status of a 
defeated country, and then by the desire to turn into an 
influential world power. 
  By the beginning of the 1990's Japan had become one of the 
most important industrial countries of the world. Processes 
evolved in Japanese society which may lead to a change in 
perception of the role of the Land of the Rising Sun in the 
world and to a corresponding adjustment of foreign policy goals 
and national security policy. 
  Japan's postwar military-political course is based on an 
alliance with the United States. For long years opposition to 
communism in the person of the USSR was its ideological basis. 
Today this basis is no more. Attaining the status of an economic 
power center permits Japan to build relations with the United 
States as an equal, which undermines the second prop of the 
American-Japanese military-political alliance--Japan's 
subordinate role in it. From a domestic political standpoint, 
Japan took advantage of the alliance with the United States to 
accomplish two interrelated tasks: unification of society in the 
face of a strong external opponent and mobilization of the 
country to "overcome an obstacle" in the form of the United 
States from an economic respect. On the whole the processes that 
are occurring can lead to strengthening of Japan's desire to act 
more independently in the world arena, above all in Asia. 
  The Japanese leadership presently continues to adhere to the 
concepts of "comprehensive assurance of national security" 
adopted in the early 1980's. In accordance with it, the 
country's national goals--"rich country, strong army," with 
present emphasis on the first part--are to be ensured with 
reliance on aggregate power and on both military as well as 
nonmilitary means. 
  Economic security holds a key place in the concept. It is 
understood to mean holding onto leading positions in the world 
economy by an increase in production efficiency, assurance of 
the use of high technology, a growth in competitiveness of 
Japanese commodities, and access to sales and raw materials 
markets, and also taking appropriate steps against undesirable 
changes in the world economic environment. An important place in 
the concept is set aside for political methods as an effective 
means of increasing its influence in the world. 
  Missions in the military area--"defending national 
territory, 
maintaining balance and stability in the Northwestern Pacific, 
safeguarding security of Japan's sea and ocean lines of 
communication"--are considered fulfillable by the Armed Forces 
with the existing numerical and effective combat strength. 
  In case foreign policy goals are revised and Japan moves 
away 
from the United States, it can begin to follow a more 
independent military-political course. In this case Japan's 
missions in the military area evidently also will be changed. 
This means security problems for CIS countries in the East also 
will take on new outlines. 
  The uniqueness of developing countries was 
determined throughout the "cold war" period by the fact that 
they were viewed as the "third world" both by great powers as 
well as by their own political elites, and being in the "third 
world" in the final account did not presume the existence of 
ethnoses with their cultural needs and areas of habitation. From 
an economic aspect it was a question about economic development 
under a "western" or "eastern" model, from a political aspect 
about a socialist or bourgeois system of society, and from an 
ideological aspect about the struggle of two ideologies. An 
alien way of thinking and an ideology created on the basis of a 
European culture often were imposed on peoples of developing 
countries. 
  Representatives of political elites of the developing 
countries themselves usually viewed their development in light 
of the European path and guided by an eclectic system of values, 
which promoted a growth of dependence on developed states. 
Therefore destruction of the bipolar structure of the world led 
to a loss of customary reference points by local leadership 
circles and at the same time to a perception of events occurring 
in the world as an opportunity for rapid resolution of old 
foreign-policy problems. 
  For CIS states, questions of security dictated by the 
cultural-historical formation of developing countries are linked 
above all with development of the situation south of 
Commonwealth borders in countries of Asia Minor and the Near and 
Middle East. The situation in this region is determined to a 
considerable extent by the strengthening influence of Islamic 
fundamentalism. Attempts are being made to realize ideas of 
spreading "true Islam" not only in the region, but also beyond 
and on this basis to create an alliance of Islamic states or a 
United States of Islam. Of course, accomplishment of these tasks 
by Islamic fundamentalists is being held up both by development 
of the domestic political situation in individual countries and 
by the state of relations among them. But one cannot deny the 
fact that realization of these plans would contribute to a 
growth of conflict in a vast region. 
  On the whole, a zone of relatively powerful states, states 
which are beginning a struggle to strengthen influence on world 
policy and which are ready to begin a new, unique repartition of 
the world, is forming south of the former USSR borders. 
  Militant nationalism is an aspect of the process of 
formation 
or disintegration of ethnic communities that is negative for 
international security and that is being most clearly manifested 
of late. The striving of peoples for self-determination, defense 
of their rights, and creation of a basis for national 
development is understandable. The desire to overcome injustice 
and consequences of infringements of their interests committed 
in the past is natural. At the same time, their attainment of 
full sovereignty essentially is impossible because the majority 
of these states are multi-ethnic. Ignoring this situation leads 
to the appearance of crises and armed conflicts which are 
capable of destabilizing the situation in the region and in the 
world. 
  Processes occurring on territory of the former 
USSR can influence the disposition and correlation of 
forces in the contemporary world to a deciding extent. It is 
important to note that historically two trends operated on the 
enormous expanse of Northern Eurasia: on the one hand, the 
desire to preserve national identity of individual peoples and, 
on the other hand, formation of a unified cultural-historical 
community for purposes of joint survival based on rejection of 
confrontation of some ethnoses with others, on coexistence, and 
on creation of a polyethnic community. Artificially imparting a 
violent nature to the second trend, especially in the last 
period of existence of the Russian Empire and USSR, blackened it 
in the peoples' eyes to a considerable extent. But the trend 
toward unification of peoples populating the enormous expanse 
from Brest to Vladivostok and from Murmansk to Kushka 
objectively is progressive in nature. 
  A desire for national self-assertion prevailed in the first 
year of CIS existence. This entailed painful problems of 
demarcation, division of property, and determination of 
boundaries. Of course, establishment of sovereignty of states on 
territory of the former USSR is irreversible, but this by no 
means contradicts these states' broadest integration in all 
areas and formation of a firm community of peoples on a new, 
democratic basis. 
  Geopolitical reality continues to be of great importance for 
unification of efforts of CIS peoples. The question of 
independent or subordinate development of the central part of 
the Euro-Asiatic continent was a very important question of 
world politics for many centuries. Peoples living here are 
between two world civilizations as it were--European (Christian) 
and Eastern (Islamic). Many generations of politicians both in 
the West as well as in the East proceeded from the importance of 
control over this space. It was believed since olden times that 
the one who possessed central Eurasia was capable of determining 
the political situation on the continent, and the one who 
controlled Eurasia ruled the entire world. 
  The emergence in the foreground of world policy of 
cultural-ethnic problems interrelated with geopolitical, 
national and confessional problems dictates the need for a close 
coupling of efforts to strengthen the independence of states 
which arose within boundaries of the former USSR and their 
integration in the defense and security area. 
<H5>  1.3. Growth of Economic Interdependence of States </H5>
  Signs of the new international relations structure which are 
showing up more and more distinctly confirm its very close tie 
with economics. The world economy essentially can be viewed as 
an integral system in which each country interacts with others 
based on common technical and economic principles of 
safeguarding, reproducing and shaping mankind's vital interests. 
Economic differences between parts of the world lie in the 
degree of development of commodity, job, capital and information 
markets, in the depth of division of labor within countries and 
the nature of their inclusion in the world market, and in the 
forms and quality of the population's social protection. This 
presumes the presence of an enormous diversity of countries from 
the standpoint of their level of socioeconomic development. 
  From the most general aspect the structure of the world 
economy can be pictured in the form of two parts: central and 
peripheral. The accumulation of achievements of the world 
economy characterizes the center and specialization in raw 
materials characterizes the periphery. Countries belonging to 
the central part possess an adjusted economic mechanism of 
self-development, while those belonging to the peripheral part 
have no such mechanism or it is rather weak. The limited nature 
of natural resources and presence of very acute ecologic, 
organizational, demographic and other problems does not allow 
all world countries to have a level of development comparable 
with the prosperity of western civilization. Therefore a 
division into developed and developing countries continues to be 
timely, although the boundary between them is gradually eroding. 
  The transition from a bipolar to a multipolar world 
structure 
in combination with a significant acceleration of processes of 
national-cultural formation and with a pluralization of national 
interests of different states, and as a result of this the 
transition to an increased likelihood of conflicts in their 
relations all have a growing effect on the nature of economic 
ties among countries. 
  A deepening of economic interdependence leads to creation of 
competing economic groupings which form around or on the basis 
of centers of world influence. 
  This process advanced farthest in Western Europe. Having 
begun at the borderline of the 1950's and 1960's, economic 
unification of Western Europe was accelerated considerably in 
the late 1980's and early 1990's. In connection with the actual 
merger with the Western European economic grouping second in 
importance, the European Free Trade Association [EFTA] (Austria, 
Iceland, Liechtenstein, Norway, Switzerland, Sweden and 
Finland), plans presently are being implemented to expand the 
influence of the principal economic organization of Western 
Europe, the European (Economic) Community, to the entire 
continent right up to boundaries of the former Soviet Union. The 
addition of Turkey, Cyprus and Malta and subsequently Hungary, 
Poland, Czechia and Slovakia to the "Common Market" is 
conjectured in the 1990's. 
  Geographic expansion of the EC is accompanied by formation 
of 
a unified Western European economic, currency and political 
space. This may be reflected concretely in the very near future 
in creation of a unified domestic market for the 340 million 
citizens of the 12 EC countries. With that development of 
events, the entire European space west of the former USSR 
borders will be economically integrated by the end of the 1990's. 
  Conclusion of the Maastricht Treaty creates a real premise 
for forming a unified policy in security matters as well. And 
although the countries which signed it often interpret Treaty 
provisions on policy in the area of EC defense differently, it 
remains a fact that the WEU--the military-political organization 
of the West second in importance after NATO and including 9 of 
the 12 EC countries with the exception of Denmark, Greece and 
Ireland--is becoming the "military component of the EC." 
  In North America the United States of America, Canada and 
Mexico intend to conclude an agreement on free trade in this 
region. Conclusion of the Canadian-American Free Trade 
Agreement, which entered into force 1 January 1989, was an 
important step in the direction of trade integration in North 
America. Establishment of a North American free trade zone may 
become a stage in formation of such a zone within the framework 
of both Americas. 
  Similar trends also have shown up in the Asiatic-Pacific 
zone. Broad discussion of the Japanese concept of a "Pacific 
community," into which it was proposed to draw the majority of 
Asiatic countries, excluding states of a socialist orientation, 
began back in the 1970's. To counterbalance this, Australia 
proposed its own vision of Pacific economic cooperation within 
the framework of an Asiatic-Pacific Council, which also 
envisages participation of the United States and Canada. In 1991 
Malaysia came out with an initiative to establish the East Asian 
Economic Grouping. This grouping presumes the inclusion of 
Japan, China, Taiwan, Hong Kong, states of the Korean Peninsula 
and Indochina, and ASEAN. Thus, there is an active search for 
ways to establish a unified economic space in the Asiatic part 
of the Pacific region. 
  In the new situation Europe and Japan will be free to form 
those economic systems which reflect their own, not American, 
cultural preferences and which will operate in the world arena 
to maximize their own prosperity. As a result, the establishment 
of economic trade zones competing with each other and headed by 
the United States, Japan and Germany is possible. 
  The factor of intensified economic interdependence clearly 
observed in the world has a direct bearing on resolution of 
security problems facing CIS countries. The advantageousness of 
preserving a unified economic space, especially the energy and 
transportation system, cooperation ties in production, and a 
coordinated currency, taxation and customs policy, was clear to 
many at the very inception of the new interstate formation. 
  The course toward economic separatism of CIS countries 
characteristic of 1992 showed that such a policy does not ensure 
sovereignty of independent states. Reliance on western 
assistance also is not justifying itself. Life itself showed 
that restoration of inter-economic ties is a pressing need. All 
CIS members are objectively interested in financial 
stabilization, in overcoming national economic disproportions on 
a collective, interstate basis, and in creating an effective 
economic and market structure. 
  Unification of efforts in the economic area is a very 
important precondition for political harmony in the 
Commonwealth. This is fundamentally important with the possible 
establishment of a minimum of three relatively independent 
economic macrostructures in the world headed by states with a 
powerful economic potential and with the inevitable attraction 
of all other countries to these spaces. 
<H5>  1.4. Progress of Science and Technology </H5>
  A very important feature of the period being experienced by 
mankind is the rapid progress of science and technology which 
has embraced essentially all countries. The process of 
information support to all spheres of activity is going on most 
intensively. Information technology transformed the trade, 
finance and banking system; administration; and management of 
economic activity in leading world countries. Self-controlled 
machines (robots) and flexible production lines (systems) began 
to be introduced to industry and agriculture. Development of 
communications and provision for on-line consumer access to 
needed information are beginning to have a substantial effect on 
policy formation. Governments cannot help but reckon with the 
fact that they are incapable of ensuring a state monopoly on 
information about the economy, society, resources and defense. 
One aspect of national sovereignty essentially is eroding, since 
it has become possible for consumers to obtain information 
regardless of state boundaries and in the shortest possible time 
periods. 
  Another aspect of information support is automation of 
processes of intellectual activity and the significant increase 
in effectiveness of all kinds of management occurring on this 
basis. This typically does not require fundamental 
transformation of existing management structures. As a result of 
technical retooling of existing systems, they are drawn as it 
were into the makeup of structures of a higher level of 
management. As a result, with strong aspects of decentralized 
management systems preserved, the state obtains an opportunity 
to effectively influence the processes taking place from the 
standpoint of unified approaches and criteria. 
  The role of technologies based on new materials and 
biotechnology is growing along with information technologies. 
Achievements in these areas are leading to revolutionary changes 
in the development of weapon systems, which in turn can 
fundamentally alter the nature of armed forces, methods of 
warfare, ways of ensuring security, as well as the place of 
states in the world hierarchy. 
  Progress in information technologies ensures preferential 
development of sophisticated systems based on achievements of 
electronics. Outstripping progress in the direction of weapon 
development connected with command and control, reconnaissance, 
communications, and electronic warfare [EW] systems has been 
achieved as a result. They are being unified into integrated 
systems for various purposes which support continuous 
collection, processing and distribution of data among forces and 
assets at all levels right up to a theater of military 
operations and in near-real time. In addition, Persian Gulf war 
experience showed the importance of the direction of weapon 
development involving conventional precision weapon systems 
capable of confidently hitting targets at a great distance under 
all weather conditions and at any time of day in armed conflicts 
of varying levels in any region of the planet. 
  A combination of these two directions opens up an 
opportunity 
for achieving a fundamentally new level of integration of means 
of warfare within the scope of global and regional multipurpose 
and specialized systems for conducting combat operations. 
  Progress in new technologies is of special importance for 
data collection. Long-range reconnaissance and surveillance 
systems can be created that operate in any meteorological 
situation and support correlative processing of information on 
military targets, which imparts high effectiveness to 
surveillance of areas of increased military danger and to 
monitoring compliance with agreements on the limitation and ban 
of individual kinds of weapons. 
  The Persian Gulf war demonstrated the importance of the 
innovation of using new materials with properties permitting a 
substantial reduction in likelihood of timely detection of a 
platform--an aircraft or helicopter--equipped for delivering a 
strike. We are speaking of stealth technology. Using this 
technology permits reducing the level of losses severalfold. 
  On the whole, such kinds of weapons and equipment as systems 
for tracking, acquiring and identifying targets at long ranges, 
long-range delivery systems and flying craft using stealth 
technology which are in an early stage of operation or are in 
the development stage already will be integrated into the 
structure of armed forces in the 1990's. Somewhat later other 
developments--directed energy weapons, a new family of 
explosives, new data processing systems and robotics--may be 
realized in the form of deployed systems. 
  Prospects for introducing new ideas and technologies to 
weapon and military equipment development are connected with a 
buildup of the scientific-technical backlog in the form of 
developed design-circuit solutions and technologies. This 
backlog can be used if necessary as a basis for decisionmaking 
for full-scale development, production and deployment of new 
weapon systems. 
  The capability of developed countries, above all economic 
power centers, to stimulate S&amp;T progress inaccessible to a 
traditional economy of an industrial or agrarian-industrial type 
can have a destabilizing effect on the world situation as a 
result of an increased gap in standards of living of the 
population of developed and developing countries. 
  Formation of a multipolar world structure is prompting 
various countries to upgrade their armed forces. The great 
expenditures and concentration of resources needed for this 
require broad development of S&amp;T cooperation, including in 
the 
military area. Introduction of S&amp;T achievements to military 
organizational development directly affects states' level of 
protection. This goes fully for CIS states. A lag in S&amp;T 
research will not be slow in telling both as a whole on the 
status of Commonwealth states in the worldwide and regional 
structure as well as on their military security. 
  Preservation of established S&amp;T ties and their further 
coordinated, comprehensive development is a very important 
condition for ensuring reliable national and collective security 
of Commonwealth countries. 
<H3>  1.5. Preserving the Significance of Military Power as an 
Important Safeguard of National Interests </H3>
  Defense and security of states in the contemporary world 
continue to be defined by the quantitative-qualitative state of 
their armed forces. Trends attesting to formation of a new 
system of international relations confirm that military power 
continues to be an important safeguard of states' interests. 
  At first glance that conclusion differs fundamentally from 
assertions which were widespread during the 1970's and 1980's 
about a reduction in the role of military force in the overall 
system of means for ensuring security. 
  What was the basis of such assertions? Above all, the 
experience of use of military force by countries of the West 
under conditions of a bipolar system of international relations. 
  Immediately following World War II the West had no reason to 
change its view of military force as the main component of state 
might or of war as a normal form of achieving political 
objectives. Destruction of enemy armed forces, disabling of his 
military-economic potential and in the final account his 
unconditional surrender were regarded as the principal military 
objectives. A precise line was drawn between a state of war and 
a state of peace. This was the so-called "total" approach to 
wars. 
  The experience of the Korean War (1951-1953) and recognition 
of the fact that with opposing sides possessing nuclear weapons 
a war between the two blocs threatened mutual destruction led to 
an expansion of the indirect use of military force in forms of 
deterrence, pressure and coercion and to establishment of the 
idea of its measured direct use. Although military force 
continued to be perceived as one of the important components of 
a country's might, wars were divided into nuclear and 
conventional, and the former ceased to be interpreted as a 
normal form of attaining political objectives (although 
aberrations also were observed in this respect, especially in 
the period of the first Reagan administration). At the same 
time, conventional wars were viewed as a natural component of 
the political process. In accordance with the concept of 
"general war and limited wars" which predominated in that 
period, a general war no longer presumed the enemy's 
unconditional surrender, and inflicting that damage on the enemy 
which would deprive his political system of the ability to 
survive began to be viewed as a criterion of victory. A limited 
war presumed laying down a strict framework from the standpoint 
of political objectives, means used and spatial scope. Measured 
use of force proceeded from the assumption that there was no 
clear line between a state of war and a state of peace and that 
transitional stages were leveled. 
  The beginning of formation of a new approach to wars and 
armed conflicts was marked by the circumstance that realization 
of the idea of "measured" use of military force, above all 
during the war in Southeast Asia (1964-1973), produced 
insignificant results. This served as a basis for the appearance 
and strengthening in the West of the thesis of the reduced role 
of military force in contemporary international relations. The 
conclusion was argued by two premises: First of all, about the 
unacceptability of using nuclear weapons as a means of achieving 
political objectives and, secondly, by automatic prolongation of 
the effect of the bipolar world's "rules of the game" to the 
period following the end of the "cold war." 
  The contemporary development of events shows the inadequacy 
of these theses to realities of the international system that is 
forming. Results of numerous studies devoted to climatic and 
biological consequences of nuclear war, an analysis of the 
"nuclear winter" phenomenon, and results of the Chernobyl 
accident contributed to an understanding of the unacceptability 
of using nuclear weapons. With the existence of a small "nuclear 
club," the role of nuclear arms as a means of political 
influence also diminished. Practical experience shows that 
nuclear weapons provide only deterrence by great powers of each 
other and not effective deterrence of other countries. 
  But lately the circle of so-called "threshold" and 
"near-threshold" countries, i.e., states capable of joining the 
"club of nuclear powers" relatively rapidly if a political 
decision is made, has expanded considerably. Argentina, Brazil, 
Israel, India, Iraq, Iran, North Korea, Pakistan, Taiwan, South 
Africa and South Korea (Table 1) can be included among them. An 
exchange of independently developed nuclear technologies has 
been established among these countries and in a number of cases 
they have become new exporters of this technology. The growth in 
nuclear capabilities is accompanied by the production and import 
of missiles capable of carrying up to a 500 kg payload for 
hundreds and even thousands of kilometers. The international 
trade in materials suitable for use as radiological weapons has 
acquired unprecedented scope. 


Table 1 - Presence of Nuclear Weapons and Delivery Vehicles in "Threshold" 
and "Near-Threshold" Countries[.sup]1[/] 

Country                       Nuclear Weapons        Delivery Vehicles 

Argentina                     No                     Under development 

Brazil                        No                     Under development 

Israel                        Yes                    Yes 

India                         Yes                    Yes 

Iraq[.sup]2[/]                 No                     Yes 

Iran[.sup]3[/]                 No                     Yes 

North Korea[.sup]3[/]          No                     Yes 

Pakistan                      Yes                    Under development 

Taiwan                        No                     Under development 

South Africa                  No                     Under development 

South Korea                   No                     Yes 

1. See "Novyy vyzov posle kholodnoy voyny': rasprostraneniye oruzhiya 
massovogo unichtozheniya" [New Challenge After the "Cold War": Proliferation 
of Mass Destruction Weapons], Russian Foreign Intelligence Service analytical 
report. 

2. Production capacities for creating nuclear munitions were put out of 
commission 

3. In an advanced stage. 


  Compared with the bipolar structure, the multipolar world 
structure creates enormously fewer obstacles in the path to 
realizing adventuristic political ambitions. In view of this, 
the thesis of the diminished role of military force in the 
nuclear version of war is doubtful. 
  The second argument also needs rethinking. Attaining 
political objectives by fighting wars was mutually deterred in 
the period of existence of the two systems. Wars ordinarily 
occurred in those parts of the world where the superpowers' 
influence was least. The bipolar system contributed to stability 
not only in relationships among, but also within states. Often 
this was an illusion of stability which, moreover, often was 
accompanied by a freeze on the authority of dictators or 
proteges of superpowers, but armed conflicts and clashes 
nevertheless were deterred. 
  There evidently will be considerably fewer of such checks 
and 
balances in the forming multipolar world. Any country which has 
decided to seize part of the territory of another state can 
realize its goals enormously more freely under existing 
conditions than several years ago. 
  Development of the new approach to wars was placed on a 
solid 
research basis in the West. By the end of the 1980's the United 
States had restored a number of provisions of "all-out" wars. 
(Armed forces can be used only in the presence of firm resolve 
to win victory and achieve total surrender from the enemy. The 
goals of war must be achieved swiftly and decisively, without 
dragging out the period of military operations. Different means 
of warfare are used without restriction in the war. In other 
words, attainment of military objectives is viewed as a 
precondition for achieving the political objective.) But these 
provisions relate only to conventional wars, since nuclear wars 
and a global conventional war now were viewed as very 
improbable. At the same time, the nuclear form did not disappear 
from the spectrum of use of military force. Regional wars and 
low-intensity conflicts are the focus of the West's attention, 
especially after the Persian Gulf war. 
  Considering changes in the contemporary world situation, 
U.S. 
and NATO military strategists believe that for the immediate 
period Russia and other CIS countries should no longer be viewed 
as enemies. Therefore the United States and its allies began 
devoting more attention to other areas of the world, regarding 
the unpredictability and instability of development of the 
international situation as the chief threat. But in the future 
it is proposed to bar CIS domination in Eurasia, having in mind 
the Commonwealth's nuclear and conventional military potentials 
and the likelihood of an effective system of its collective 
security being established. 
  By the end of 1991 the U.S. military-political leadership 
formulated a new content of military strategy as applied to the 
international situation up to the end of the 20th century. Four 
basic provisions are its basis. 
  1. Strategic deterrence and strategic defense as its 
element. 
Strategic deterrence remains an important principle of new U.S. 
military strategy since, in the U.S. leadership's opinion, the 
presence of nuclear arsenals of CIS states and the intensive 
development of armed forces of leading developing countries 
provide no grounds for rejecting this concept. 
  2. Capability of reacting to crisis situations. This 
provision requires rapid, effective reaction in case of the 
appearance of those regional conflicts in which vital interests 
of the United States and its allies are threatened. In 
accordance with it, in peacetime the United States must be 
capable of exerting influence in those regions where its Armed 
Forces are present on a permanent basis, and during war it must 
have the opportunity of reinforcing forward-based forces while 
simultaneously neutralizing threats in other areas important to 
the country's security. 
  3. Presence on forward lines. Demonstration of an intention 
of safeguarding its interests by military means is achieved as 
follows: by stationing groupings of armed forces on a permanent 
or rotating basis, supported by appropriate basing; by 
concluding agreements with allies and friendly countries on 
access to bases (depots); by joint planning and conduct of 
exercises and so on. 
  4. Restoration of military potential. Regardless of upcoming 
troop and arms reductions, it envisages preserving the 
capability of building up armed forces in case a regional war 
develops into a global war and in case of U.S. involvement in it. 
  To implement these provisions the U.S. Armed Forces command 
developed the "base forces" concept, which envisages upkeep of a 
minimum number of Armed Forces as the basis for deployment of 
additional units in case a regional war develops into a global 
war. Its basis is the so-called "package" principle of planning 
the Armed Forces numerical and effective combat strength. 
  The United States believes that the "base forces" concept 
permits accomplishing missions of military strategy with a 
lesser number of Armed Forces. In this connection it was 
announced that by the mid-1990's the U.S. Armed Forces numerical 
strength will be reduced by 25 percent compared with the 
numerical strength at the end of the 1980's. In fact it is 
proposed to reduce regular forces to 1.6 million persons (by 21 
percent) and reserve components to 0.9 million (by 18 percent). 
  The Army will account for the main reduction in the U.S. 
Armed Forces. The number of divisions will be reduced from 18 to 
12 in the regular forces and from 10 to 6 in the reserve. Along 
with the reduction, the objective is to make them more flexible, 
mobile and ready for rapid deployment through qualitative 
reoutfitting with advanced kinds of weapons and military 
equipment, modernization of existing models, and creation of 
precision conventional weapons. 
  By the mid-1990's it is planned to have 26 tactical air 
wings 
(72 aircraft in a wing) in the Air Force--15 in the regular 
forces and 11 in the reserve. There presently are 36--24 and 12 
equivalent wings respectively. Despite reductions, the Air Force 
command intends to maintain superiority over aviation of any 
state. To this end the proportion of multipurpose aircraft is 
being increased, their combat effectiveness is being improved 
and the air fleet is constantly being upgraded and replaced. 
Nuclear weapons are being retained in the tactical air inventory. 
  The number of U.S. Navy attack carriers is being reduced 
from 
16 to 13, the number of carrier-based air wings is being reduced 
from 15 to 13, and the overall number of ships should drop from 
545 to 451. Programs for creating the most modern means of naval 
warfare such as the guided missile cruiser Arleigh Burke and the 
nuclear powered submarine Seawolf remain in force. 
  The possibility of a further reduction in the U.S. Armed 
Forces is being examined. 
  Thus, changes in U.S. military strategy demonstrate that the 
United States has begun to retreat from a bipolar view of the 
world. This circumstance could not help but affect the direction 
of development of NATO military doctrine and organizational 
development of armed forces of the principal European countries. 
  The strategic concept adopted at a NATO Council session 
(November 1991) marks a new stage in development of North 
Atlantic Alliance military strategy. It is based on a broader 
concept of security, i.e., it reinforces the political, 
economic, social and cultural aspects of activity. The military 
component is viewed as a guarantee against a return to 
confrontation. It is believed that sufficient military force 
with corresponding combat capabilities will continue to be 
needed as a measure lowering the possibility of the outbreak of 
conflicts. A very important change in NATO strategy is a 
transfer of efforts from preparation for a general war or a war 
on the entire European continent from Norway to Turkey to 
preparation for limited or local wars. 
  The NATO leadership presently believes that the danger of a 
surprise, large-scale attack in the Central European theater has 
been eliminated and the likelihood of direct aggression against 
any of the bloc countries has been minimized. At the same time 
it is noted that the CIS (Russia) represents not only a 
"residual threat," but also a significant risk to Europe, 
considering Russia's nuclear might, military capabilities and 
potential for building them up. Four provisions of NATO military 
strategy determining armed forces organizational development 
must be noted. 
  First of all, nuclear weapons now are viewed as 
the last resort, which substantially raises the "nuclear 
threshold" and reduces the importance of tactical nuclear 
weapons. In this connection emphasis is placed on development of 
air-based and sea-based delivery vehicles possessing long range 
of deployment, high accuracy and lesser vulnerability. 
  Secondly, a "reduced forward presence" concept has 
been adopted for the Central European theater in place of the 
"forward defense" concept, which presumes rejection of 
concentrating the main Allied Forces grouping directly at 
borders and transition to its echeloned dispersion within the 
entire theater. 
  Thirdly, realization of the idea of multinational 
forces is being expanded substantially. While previously it 
extended to large strategic formations (such as the Northern and 
Central army groups), now it extends to force elements such as 
army corps, division and brigade. 
  Fourthly, the significance of mobility, both 
strategic as well as tactical, is increasing. 
  The following are principal elements of the new structure of 
bloc Allied Forces: smaller and more mobile units, multinational 
large strategic formations and formations, and an upgraded 
mobilization deployment system. In this connection it must be 
noted that it is planned to have three basic components in the 
NATO Allied Forces: Rapid Deployment Force, main defensive 
forces, and troop reinforcements. 
  Like the United States, European countries intend to reduce 
the numerical strength of their armed forces by the mid-1990's 
as follows: FRG 24 percent, Great Britain 17 percent and Italy 3 
percent. The number of strategic nuclear forces of Great Britain 
and France will remain unchanged. At the same time, their 
qualitative upgrading is planned: in Great Britain 
Resolution-Class SSBN's with 16 Polaris A-3TK SLBM's will be 
replaced by SSBN's close in characteristics to the U.S. SSBN 
Ohio and armed with Trident 2 SLBM's; France plans to replace 
SSBN's with the new Le Triomphant-Class SSBN's and equip 
strategic aviation with air-to-surface nuclear missiles produced 
using stealth technology. 
  The numerical strength of ground troops of NATO European 
countries is planned to be reduced by an average of 20-30 
percent by the mid-1990's. The number of FRG divisions will be 
cut from 12 to 10 and the number of brigades of Great Britain 
and Italy from 16 to 8 and from 21 to 17 respectively. 
  The numerical strength of air force personnel of European 
countries evidently will not change in the 1990's and the air 
fleet basically will remain the same. 
  Trends in organizational development of navies of European 
countries are ambiguous. Great Britain proposes to reduce the 
numerical strength of personnel by 17 percent and FRG by 11 
percent by the mid-1990's and France and Italy intend to keep it 
in the previous amount. The number of FRG surface ships will 
drop 43 percent, Italy will increase them by 9 percent, and they 
will remain at approximately the 1991 level in Great Britain, 
but the latter will reduce the number of submarines 41 percent. 
The number of combat aircraft will change toward an increase 
only for Italy, by 43 percent; it will remain approximately at 
the 1991 level for the other countries. The number of combat 
helicopters in the navy will increase 70 percent in the FRG and 
30 percent in France. On the whole the UK and French navies will 
retain their positions as the most important fleets of Europe. 
The role of the Italian Navy may rise. 
  On the whole the changes occurring in military doctrines and 
organizational development of armed forces of foreign countries 
are rather substantial, but their direction and proposed results 
do not permit concluding that the world will become safer by the 
end of the 1990's. The doctrinal shift from preparation for 
all-out (global) war to preparation for regional wars signifies 
only that the possibility of using armed conflicts as a means of 
achieving national interests is preserved. Although the makeup 
and structure of armed forces of western countries basically are 
stabilizing toward the mid-1990's, constant outfitting of troops 
with increasingly advanced models of weapons and military 
equipment increases their combat capabilities, and this cannot 
help but be taken into account in military organizational 
development of CIS states and in formation of a collective 
security system. 
  The influence of a particular state in the world arena is 
determined not only by the political and military objectives it 
sets for itself, but also by the status of its 
military-industrial base, by its "contribution" to the arms 
trade and by its position in arms control talks. 
  Contemporary military production (outside the CIS) is 
concentrated in the United States, Western Europe and the Far 
East, which actually coincides with the main world power 
centers. The dominant position in this production belongs to the 
United States, which possesses a powerful scientific-production 
base permitting creation and output of all types of nuclear and 
conventional weapons using latest technologies and materials. 
  The main production capacities of Western European military 
industry are concentrated in the FRG, France and Great Britain. 
These countries supply their own armies' needs for arms and 
military equipment and are the competition for the United States 
in the world arms market. 
  Japan potentially is capable of producing any arms, 
including 
nuclear arms. For political reasons, the Japanese do not produce 
mass destruction weapons or those kinds of arms categorized as 
offensive. Factors of a political nature in the new world 
situation may cease to be a means deterring Japan from producing 
those kinds of weapons. 
  Military production is growing in developing countries which 
have a sufficient S&amp;T and industrial base and necessary 
materials and raw material resources and which use foreign 
licenses. This trend is capable of affecting the world balance 
of military forces in the not-too-distant future. 
  A number of developing countries already essentially have 
fully met the needs of their own armed forces for artillery, 
small arms, ammunition, multiple-launch rocket systems, various 
classes of tactical missiles, and partially for light armored 
equipment and small combatants. The majority of these countries 
emphasize development of operational-tactical missiles. 
  The growth of military production in developing countries 
permits them to feel less dependent on developed states and to 
behave more independently in choosing a political course. 
  The arms and military equipment trade has become an 
important 
factor of the international situation and its volume is 
constantly increasing. The main flow of weapons (two-thirds of 
deliveries for 1981-1990) goes from developed to developing 
countries. The Near and Middle East account for the principal 
part of this amount. Saudi Arabia was the chief importing 
country in the 1980's, accounting for a third of all deliveries 
to developing countries. Egypt, Israel, Taiwan, South Korea, 
India, Pakistan and Thailand are among the countries supporting 
their military potential through imports to a considerable 
extent. The proportion of new and the latest models is growing 
in the world arms and military equipment trade, which 
qualitatively changes the nature of probable armed conflicts in 
the zone of developing countries. 
  New exporters from among developing countries, above all 
Argentina, Brazil, Egypt, Pakistan, Singapore and South Korea, 
are moving into the world arms trade market along with 
traditional suppliers. They offer modern models of arms and 
military equipment of their own development which have imported 
assemblies and parts, or assemblies and parts being produced 
under licenses. Almost the entire volume of these exporters' 
deliveries is oriented toward developing countries. This leads 
to where, in case armed conflicts break out in Asia, Africa or 
Latin America, their participants' needs can be met more fully 
by suppliers which are not under the control of developed states. 
  Arms control talks became an influential factor of 
international relations back in the "cold war" years. 
Implementation of treaties concluded on strategic and 
conventional arms is substantially reducing their arsenal in 
Europe and to a certain extent in the United States. For the 
time being only the United States and Russia are reducing their 
nuclear potentials. The other "nuclear club" members are not 
taking part. The negotiation process has not affected developing 
countries for now. Meanwhile, the new world situation demands 
the most fixed attention of the world community to problems of 
disarmament in these countries. 
  It is not difficult to foresee that in the upcoming decade 
there will be an exacerbation of the problem of horizontal 
proliferation of nuclear weapons and of ensuring control of 
conventional arms in the world as a whole. Serious progress in 
the conventional arms control area had been achieved only in 
Europe by the beginning of the 1990's. Consistent fulfillment of 
the Paris Treaty on Conventional Arms (1990) should eliminate 
the possibility of the delivery of surprise strikes and conduct 
of wide-scale operations in Europe. 
  An analysis shows that in parallel with changes in the 
global 
political, economic and cultural-ethnic picture, there is 
latent, slow progress in the disposition and correlation of 
forces from a military aspect. While there continue to be highly 
effective nuclear and conventional forces in a number of 
countries west and east of the CIS, which requires preserving 
the appropriate strategic balance, the military potential of 
countries lying south of the CIS has a tendency to grow 
steadily. In view of the fact that the situation in this region 
is fraught with unexpectedness and the possibility of crises 
developing into local conflicts and regional wars, it is 
important to be ready to prevent and stop them in the interests 
of all Commonwealth states. 
<H5>  1.6. An Increase in the Level of Conflict </H5>
  Contemporary security problems are linked inseparably with a 
sharp increase in the number of regional conflicts on political, 
national-ethnic and religious soil. Southeastern Europe, the 
Near and Middle East and territories of a number of former USSR 
republics (Azerbaijan, Armenia, Georgia, Moldova, Tajikistan and 
the Caucasian region of Russia) have become the principal 
conflict zones. The geographic position of conflict zones and 
political aspects of their development have a direct bearing on 
CIS security. 
  Above all this concerns conflicts on territories of 
Commonwealth member countries as well as of former Soviet 
republics which did not become its members. According to 
official statistics, 125 peoples lived in the former USSR, the 
majority of whom inhabit compact ethnic territories. At the same 
time, 65 million persons live outside of their national 
formations and 50 million are consolidated as mixed national 
families. Even these data alone show how complex the problem is. 
It is aggravated both by disputes concerning one and the same 
territory historically belonging to different ethnoses and the 
right to be an autonomy or an independent state, as well as by 
changes in the demographic situation because of an increased 
proportion of a foreign ethnic population, in part as a result 
of the deportation of certain nationalities of the USSR during 
1937-1944. Clarification of the outline of many boundaries 
between former USSR republics, which in a unitary state 
essentially were of a formal, conditionally administrative 
nature, is of special significance in this respect. 
  Perpetuation of sources of tension conceals the threat of 
escalation of inter-ethnic conflicts. The zone of conflict 
actions on former USSR territory expanded from year to year. 
While Nagornyy Karabakh was practically the only site of armed 
clashes in 1988, several conflict centers already had arisen in 
the Transcaucasus and Central Asia in 1989; then the flame of 
very acute conflicts spread to the North Caucasus and Dniester 
region. The tendency toward a buildup in the explosive mass of 
conflict threatens security on the Euro-Asiatic continent as a 
whole. 
  This causes natural concern of states situated west, south 
and east of the CIS. The world community does not need a sixth 
of the planet split, fighting, or shaken by crises and 
conflicts, but a united, flourishing community independently 
solving its own internal problems and capable of actively 
participating in resolving international security problems. 
  All this turns the prevention of armed conflicts, or their 
limitation and cessation in case they have arisen, into a very 
important task in organizing the post-Soviet space, above all 
within boundaries of the CIS and nearby. 
  An analysis of trends in development of international 
relations confirms that the world community is entering a new 
era in its development--an era of radical change in the 
disposition of forces in the international arena, a change in 
goals and tasks of the participants of world politics, a growth 
of economic interdependence, and an intensification of conflict 
on a local and regional level. 
  Under these conditions the western powers' official 
rejection 
of military-political confrontation with CIS member states and 
their readiness to build relations on the basis of dialogue, 
trust and cooperation are of fundamental importance. At the same 
time the facts show that attempts by individual countries or 
groups of countries to follow a course toward regional or global 
domination based on military-force approaches are not precluded 
in various regions of the world. The internationalization and 
escalation of national and religious crises and the 
disintegration of multi-ethnic states also are capable of 
leading to military clashes. 
  Instability of the domestic political and socioeconomic 
situation in CIS states contributes to the perpetuation of 
danger. Such instability is dictated above all by socioeconomic 
crisis, presence of zones of military conflicts, unresolved 
nature of mutual claims, including the division of property of 
the former USSR, and appearance of unconstitutional armed units. 
  Internal instability in CIS states is becoming a source of 
threat not only to national security, but also to regional and 
world security. And the circumstance that a number of 
Commonwealth countries are incapable of coping with the causes 
of instability by themselves dictates the need to consolidate 
efforts, above all economic and defense efforts, for supporting 
a course of democratic transformations, prosperity and peace for 
CIS peoples. 
<H3>  Part 2 - The CIS--A New Form of Association of Sovereign 
Countries </H3>
  The February and October revolutions of 1917 and the 
attempted coup d'&eacute;tat in August 1991 became events whose 
consequences played an enormous role in changing Russia's 
appearance in the 20th century. The Romanov family's reign over 
one-sixth of land on Earth ended in 1917 and creation of the 
Soviet Union, proclaimed by the RSFSR, Ukraine, Belorussia and 
the Transcausus Republic on 30 December 1922, began on the 
Russian Empire's ruins. Removal of the Communist Party from 
power concluded in 1991, which in the final account led to 
termination of the Soviet Union's existence as a unitary state. 
<H5>  2.1. Formation of the Commonwealth </H5>
  The process of disintegration and above all decentralization 
of power in favor of republics in the USSR began to deepen 
toward the end of the 1980's. Among the principal reasons for 
this was dissatisfaction with the standard of living and a 
growth of socioeconomic problems. Attempts failed to adapt the 
socioeconomic system to the new conditions in the latter half of 
the 1980's while keeping state ownership and the 
administrative-command management system practically inviolable. 
Relying on the 1977 USSR Constitution, under which they had the 
right to leave the Union, republics one after the other began 
declaring their independence or supremacy of their laws over 
Union laws. 
  The crisis of central authority sparked a search for new 
forms of inter-republic relations. A number of attempts were 
made during 1991 to find an optimum solution to this problem. On 
24 April USSR President M. S. Gorbachev and leaders of nine 
Union republics adopted a joint Declaration which noted the need 
for signing a new Union Treaty; this presumed adoption of a new 
Constitution and new elections. This Declaration was not signed 
by Armenia, Georgia, Moldova, Lithuania, Latvia and Estonia. The 
draft Union Treaty was published in late June 1991 and was 
approved by nine republics. Armenia joined their number and 
Ukraine left. In accordance with the draft Treaty a minimum of 
functions connected above all with ensuring external security 
and forming a budget remained under the purview of Union 
structures. The draft Treaty was to have been opened for signing 
on 19 August 1991. 
  The attempted coup d'&eacute;tat during 19-21 August led to 
where those republics which had not yet announced their 
independence did so. The process of decentralizing the political 
structure accelerated. Republics received the right to full 
autonomy in their domestic affairs. By November 1991 the 
disintegration process led to termination of the development of 
any kind of supplementary agreements. Relying on declarations of 
independence and sovereignty, the republics began speeding up 
the transition of Union ownership and interests to republic 
subordination. A referendum and presidential elections in 
Ukraine, which made any likelihood of this republic joining any 
kind of structure with central coordinating authorities null and 
void, became very important events. 


Declaration of Independence by States Formed on USSR Territory 

Name                                     Date of Declaration 

Azerbaijan Republic                      30 August 1991 

Latvia                                   4 May 1990 

Lithuania                                11 March 1990 

Republic of Armenia                      23 September 1991 

Republic of Belarus                      27 August 1991 

Republic of Georgia                      9 April 1991 

Republic of Moldova                      27 August 1991 

Republic of Kazakhstan                   16 December 1991 

Republic of Kyrgyzstan                   31 August 1991 

Republic of Tajikistan                   9 September 1991 

Republic of Uzbekistan                   31 August 1991 

Russian Federation                       * 

Turkmenistan                             27 October 1991 

Ukraine                                  24 August 1991 

Estonia                                  20 August 1991 

*The Russian Federation did not adopt any kind of document similar to other 
republics' documents establishing independence. 


  Thus, the potential for reform of the Soviet Union had been 
totally exhausted by the end of 1991. The leadership of 
republics which belonged to the USSR realized the need to find a 
new form of joint existence guaranteeing independence and equal 
rights on the one hand and on the other hand preventing total, 
uncontrollable disintegration of the former Union, which was 
fraught with the possibility of outbreak of a Yugoslav type of 
conflict. 
  A new legal and political form of voluntary association of 
the sovereign states was found at a meeting of heads of state of 
the Russian Federation, Ukraine and Belarus in Belovezhskaya 
pushcha near Minsk: an Agreement on Establishment of the 
Commonwealth of Independent States was signed on 8 December 
1991. The Agreement Preamble stated: "We, the republics of 
Belarus, Russian Federation and Ukraine, as founding states of 
the USSR which signed the 1922 Treaty, verify that the USSR is 
ceasing its existence as a component of international law and as 
a geopolitical reality." 
  Two weeks later, on 21 December 1991, eight others 
(Azerbaijan, Armenia, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Moldova, 
Tajikistan, Turkmenistan and Uzbekistan) joined the three 
republic-initiators in Alma-Ata. The Soviet Union actually 
ceased to exist on 25 December 1991 after USSR President 
Gorbachev officially announced termination of performance of his 
duties. 
  In accordance with decisions made in Minsk and Alma-Ata, the 
eleven countries parties agreed to the following: 

  -  recognize and respect each other's territorial integrity 
and the inviolability of existing borders; 
  -  guarantee openness of borders and freedom of movement of 
citizens and transfer of information within the framework of the 
Commonwealth (in ratifying the Agreement Ukraine declared that 
its boundary line with Russia and Belarus is its state border); 
  -  cooperate in ensuring international peace and security and in 
taking effective steps to reduce arms and military expenditures; 
strive for elimination of all nuclear arms and for general and 
complete disarmament under strict international control; 
  -  respect each other's desire to attain the status of a 
non-nuclear zone or neutral state; 
  -  recognize the area of foreign-policy activity, fight against 
organized crime and so on as their sphere of joint activity 
realized on the basis of equal rights through common 
coordinating institutions of the Commonwealth; 
  -  guarantee fulfillment of international obligations stemming 
for 
them from treaties and agreements of the former USSR; 
  -  accomplish the interworking of Commonwealth members on the 
principle of equal rights through coordinating institutions 
being formed on a parity basis and operating under the procedure 
determined by the Agreement among members of the Commonwealth, 
which is neither a state nor a suprastate formation. 

    Commonwealth member countries declared the following: 

  -  they intend to develop their relations based on mutual 
recognition and respect of state sovereignty, inalienable right 
to self-determination, principles of equal rights and 
nonintervention in internal affairs, rejection of the use of 
force and of economic or other methods of pressure, settlement 
of controversial problems by conciliation methods, and respect 
for human rights and freedoms and other generally recognized 
principles and rules of international law; 
  -  they believe that development and strengthening of relations 
of 
friendship, good-neighborliness and mutually advantageous 
cooperation among them, which have deep historical roots, are in 
the fundamental national interests of their peoples and serve 
the cause of peace and security; 
  -  they affirm their adherence to goals and principles of the UN 
Charter, the Helsinki Final Act and other CSCE documents; 
  -  they recognize their responsibility for preserving civil 
peace 
and inter-ethnic concord. 

    The year 1992 became the year of development of mutually 
acceptable forms of cooperation based on the 1991 Belovezh and 
Alma-Ata agreements. Each state of the former USSR chose its own 
path of development, which determined the diversity of their 
attitude toward the CIS. 
  It was learned practically at once that there were two 
prevailing viewpoints shared (with certain nuances) by the 
republics which signed the 1991 Alma-Ata Agreement. One 
viewpoint presumed a movement toward establishing an eastern 
analogue of the European Union and NATO--a Euro-Asiatic 
community--in place of the USSR. As a result of the process of 
such a community's formation it was proposed to establish an 
effective interstate association with coordinating bodies, a 
unified economic space, unified currency, unified market reform 
strategy, coordinated taxation and customs policy, combined 
armed forces, transparent internal borders, and joint control of 
external borders. These ideas were shared by a large group of 
countries headed by Kazakhstan and Russia. 
  The second viewpoint reduced to the need to establish within 
the framework of the former USSR only a mechanism permitting its 
members to resolve problems of Soviet heritage in various areas 
in a civilized manner. This point of view was manifested most 
clearly in Ukraine's position. 
  The development of events led to a change in the status of 
Azerbaijan and Moldova in the CIS: The Azerbaijan Parliament did 
not ratify the Alma-Ata Declaration and the Moldovan Parliament 
did not consider it. At the same time, Moldovan President M. 
Snegur signed the Declaration of the Council of Heads of States 
Parties to the CIS in January 1993, which recorded the intention 
of preserving the Commonwealth. Representatives of these states 
are taking part in the work of CIS bodies and structures. 
Representatives of Georgia, which postponed a decision on the 
question of joining the Commonwealth until the period after 
stabilization of the domestic political situation, also are 
taking part in CIS work. 
  From the moment they declared their sovereignty the Baltic 
republics (Latvia, Lithuania and Estonia) set a course toward 
distancing themselves from the USSR and toward rapprochement 
with countries of Western Europe. After formation of the CIS the 
Baltic countries began to adhere to the line of rejecting 
cooperation with the former Soviet republics on a multilateral 
basis. 
  The year which passed after signing of the Agreement on the 
CIS, the Protocol thereto and the Alma-Ata Declaration showed 
that respect for different paths of development and tolerance 
for contradictoriness of positions could be a basis for 
formation of the Commonwealth. The following circumstances also 
contributed to this. During 1992 the new states acquired basic 
attributes of statehood and were recognized by the world 
community. New structures of authority were elected and are 
operating in the majority of them. The practical conclusion of 
the division of former USSR property and the republics' 
establishment of their own full control over local resources 
became an important factor. 
  The formation of Commonwealth states as independent 
components of international relations is coupled with their 
difficult, sobering realization of the real opportunities for 
obtaining foreign economic assistance and for involvement in 
international associations outside the CIS, and also realization 
of prospects for their own move into foreign markets. Life 
showed the effective role of mutual relations of former USSR 
republics in all areas and the need for preserving and 
developing them on a qualitatively new basis of equality and 
civilized partnership which takes full account of each other's 
national-state interests. 
  Two directions of cooperation were developed. The first 
encompassed efforts connected with formation of a set of 
bilateral relations among CIS states as components of 
international relations. The second included work to establish a 
multilateral basis of cooperation. Adoption of the CIS Charter 
in Minsk in January 1993 became a kind of milestone in 
materializing these interrelated directions. Stressing that the 
Commonwealth is not a state and does not possess supranational 
powers, the Charter proclaims its following objectives: 

  -  cooperation in different areas; 
  -  comprehensive, balanced economic and social development of 
member states within the framework of a common economic space, 
and interstate cooperation and integration; 
  -  assurance of human rights and basic freedoms; 
  -  cooperation among member states in ensuring international 
peace 
and security; 
  -  assistance to citizens of member states in free 
intercourse, contacts and movement within the Commonwealth; 
  -  mutual legal assistance and cooperation in other spheres of 
legal relations; 
  -  peaceful resolution of disputes and 
conflicts. 

    The Charter includes the following among spheres of joint 
activity of member states, realized on the basis of equal rights 
through common coordinating institutions: 

  -  coordination of foreign policy activity; 
  -  cooperation in forming and developing a common economic 
space, 
European and Euro-Asiatic markets, and customs policy; 
  -  cooperation in developing transportation and communication 
systems; 
  -  protection of health and the environment; 
  -  questions of social and migration policy; 
  -  fight against organized crime; 
  -  cooperation in the area of defense policy and security of 
external borders. 

    The Charter confirms principles of mutual relations of 
member 
countries laid down in the Agreement on Establishment of the CIS 
and the Alma-Ata Declaration. 
  The Charter allows different forms of integration and 
accession to it. Nine states which, at the moment the Charter 
was signed, signed and ratified the Agreement on Establishment 
of the CIS dated 8 December 1991 and the Protocol to this 
Agreement dated 21 December 1991 are founding states of the 
Commonwealth. They are Armenia, Belarus, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, 
Russian Federation, Tajikistan, Turkmenistan, Uzbekistan and 
Ukraine. Those founding states which assume obligations under 
the present Charter within one year after its adoption by the 
Heads of State Council are considered member states. This 
concerns all the above nine states with consideration of the 
fact that the leaders of seven states (Armenia, Belarus, 
Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Russian Federation, Tajikistan, 
Uzbekistan) adopted the Commonwealth Charter and recommended it 
to their countries' parliaments for ratification, and two 
states, Turkmenistan and Ukraine, did not sign the decision on 
the CIS Charter. A state which shares the objectives and 
principles of the Commonwealth and assumes obligations contained 
in the Charter also can become a Commonwealth member by 
accession to it with the consent of all member states. Moldova, 
Azerbaijan, Georgia and others can be such states. 
  A state desiring to participate in individual forms of 
Commonwealth activity can accede to it as an associate member on 
terms specified by the Agreement on Associate Membership. By 
decision of the Heads of State Council, representatives of other 
states may take part in work of Commonwealth bodies as observers. 
  Adoption of the Charter proved the viability of the CIS by 
putting an end to the period of uncertainty. Those states which 
signed the Charter in fact declared their readiness for further 
integration in all areas. Those states which signed only the 
Declaration of Heads of States Parties expressed their interest 
in the Commonwealth's further existence and in deepening of 
economic integration. All this shows that of the two 
trends--toward expansion of cooperation in different areas and 
toward use of the CIS only as a means of civilized divorce--the 
former is beginning to predominate. 
  [Following paragraphs are box insert] 
<H6>  Initiators of CIS Establishment on Importance of the 
Commonwealth </H6>
  Russian President Boris Yeltsin: 
  "The Commonwealth lived and gathered experience. We 
realized that we cannot live without each other. Experience in 
peacemaking actions appeared. What the CSCE and UN Security 
Council failed to do managed to be done by CIS peacemaking 
forces in some of its regions. The CIS is the only real form for 
solving common problems." 
  Chairman of Belarusian Parliament Stanislav Shushkevich: 
  "I am absolutely convinced that the minimum of tasks 
which Belarus posed in the CIS managed to be done. We would not 
have succeeded in resolving many of the problems within the 
framework of bilateral relations." 
  Ukrainian President Leonid Kravchuk: 
  "Not all questions have to be resolved within the 
Commonwealth framework. In a number of cases bilateral relations 
are of enormously greater importance. But there are those 
problems which can be resolved only today and only in the 
CIS." 
  [End box insert] 
<H3>  2.2 Formation of Approaches to Collective Security and to 
Cooperation of CIS States in the Military Area </H3>
  Political events on territory of the former Soviet Union 
could not help but tell on the status of armed forces and on 
approaches to safeguarding the security of peoples populating 
the post-Soviet space. The need to conduct military reform and 
the military policy of the leadership--initially of republics 
within the framework of the USSR and then of independent 
states--became basic factors affecting the direction of armed 
forces organizational development during 1991-1992. 
  The question of reforming the Army and Navy began to be 
discussed from the end of the 1980's. In this period the 
following were proposed as basic directions of reform: 
increasing the effectiveness of leadership of the entire sphere 
of the country's defense; bringing the structure of armed 
forces, directions of weapon and military equipment development, 
and financing of military organizational development into line 
with the real military danger; orienting military organizational 
development toward qualitative characteristics of defense; 
professionalizing the army in stages; democratizing society's 
entire military organization in accordance with principles of a 
rule-of-law state and rules of international law; and taking 
national-historical traditions and progressive experience of 
military organizational development into account. 
  The need for military reform was dictated above all because 
maintaining an army of four million did not equate to conditions 
of the end of the "cold war." Tasks of reducing the numerical 
strength of armed forces and arms, social protection of 
servicemen, professionalization of the army and its structure, 
and other tasks shifted to a practical plane. A reduction in the 
armed forces of a half-million persons was accomplished within 
the channel of realization of these tasks; the structure of 
armed forces large strategic ground formations was rationally 
reorganized in a defensive spirit with an unprecedentedly abrupt 
reduction in the proportion of tanks by 20-40 percent; a 
defensive grouping began to be established within USSR borders 
with the withdrawal of all military contingents from abroad; 
intermediate-range and shorter-range missiles were mutually 
eliminated with the United States; treaties were concluded on 
strategic offensive arms reduction (START) and on conventional 
armed forces in Europe; and extensive work was done on real 
confidence-building measures. 
  The army reform process accelerated sharply after August 
1991. The party was eliminated from the armed forces and the 
system of military-political bodies was abolished. The previous 
armed forces structure conformed less and less to the new 
political situation with the growth of disintegrative processes 
which encompassed the defense sphere as well. At the same time, 
the state and armed forces leadership continued to proceed from 
the assumption that a unified economic space had to be ensured 
by a unified defensive space and unified armed forces. The 
importance of armed forces unity also was dictated by 
international aspects. Noncompliance with the USSR's treaties 
with other states and a change in the regime of involvement in 
multilateral agreements could negatively affect the 
international security system. 
  Much spoke in favor of that choice. The USSR Armed Forces 
were built as unified armed forces with a rigidly centralized 
command and control and a unified system of support and military 
infrastructure. They were stationed throughout USSR territory, 
but the most sizeable groupings were concentrated in Central and 
Eastern Europe and in the western and eastern parts of the 
country. Strategic nuclear forces were stationed in Russia, 
Ukraine, Kazakhstan and Belarus. The Army and Air Force were 
stationed in all republics, and very unevenly, since attack 
groupings had been established on the western axis. 
  The uneven stationing of USSR Armed Forces on the territory 
of republics in 1991 is evident from Table 2. 


Table 2 - Stationing of USSR Armed Forces by Republics[.sup]1[/] 

Republic          Divisions        Aircraft        ICBM's        Heavy 
                                                                 Bombers 

Russia            71               2,380           1,035         70 

Ukraine           20               850             176           30 

Belarus           10               470             72            - 

Kazakhstan        4                340             104           - 

Uzbekistan        1                290             -             - 

Turkmenia         4                160             -             - 

Kyrgyzstan        1                -               -             - 

Armenia           3                -               -             - 

Azerbaijan        4                130             -             - 

Georgia           4                240             -             - 

Moldova           1                -               -             - 

Estonia           1                110             -             - 

Latvia            1                180             -             - 

Lithuania         4                70              -             - 

1. See "Military Forces in Transition 1991," pp 32, 51. 


  The Armed Forces began to be reorganized in four directions. 
The first was professionalization. Gradual progress 
toward a professional army was proposed, based on comprehensive 
calculations taking into account realities of the international 
military-political situation and the country's socioeconomic and 
scientific-technical capacities. 
  The second direction was a qualitative upgrading 
of armed forces in various areas: technical outfitting, table of 
organization structure, command and control, and support. 
  The third direction involved social aspects of the 
Army and Navy: democratization of life in the Armed Forces based 
on openness and glasnost for everything concerning military 
service that does not comprise state or military secrets. The 
activity of officer meetings; functioning efficiency report 
boards; warrant officer, NCO and petty officer councils; 
personnel meetings; and public organizations began to be livened 
up for this purpose. 
  The fourth direction was observance of the 
principle of sufficiency. In the views of the new command 
element, this principle had to be materialized in the following 
approach: have nothing in excess and create nothing in excess 
that is not needed for national defense, i.e., provide an 
effective defense with minimum forces and assets with least 
costs. 
  On the whole, unified armed forces possessing high 
professionalism, outfitted with modern arms and military 
equipment, possessing a developed infrastructure, having a 
democratic organization of life and sufficient for absolutely 
reliable defense of a Union state were to be the result of the 
outlined plans. 
  It was proposed that republic authorities and their military 
structures would take part in developing and implementing 
military policy, forming a defense budget, training reserves, 
organizing the call-up and so on. Establishing small military 
units of the national guard type at the disposal of republics 
was considered justified to support the republics' real 
sovereignty. 
  Proclamation of independence of the Soviet Union's republics 
did not directly lead to a change in positions of the leadership 
of individual countries after the August events of 1991. This 
was manifested in the fact that in the course of various 
conferences all republics (with the exception of Baltic 
countries) affirmed the need for unity of armed forces in 
establishing a guard in the republics based on internal security 
forces. 
  The Agreement on Establishment of the CIS, the Protocol 
thereto and the Alma-Ata Declaration were characterized by a 
desire to keep the armed forces unified. Essentially no one with 
the exception of Ukraine cast doubt on the need to act 
specifically that way. No one's plans extended further than 
establishing national guards. In the 8 December 1991 Agreement 
the parties pledged "to preserve and keep the common 
military-strategic space under combined command, including 
unified control over nuclear weapons." In this connection 
Belarusian Supreme Soviet Chairman V. Shushkevich declared: "We 
had to find a worthy version so that, having received genuine 
sovereignty, the borders would not be disconnected and we would 
follow a policy that was independent but coordinated with 
neighbors. . . . It seems we were able to do this. We found a 
version for preserving unified armed forces and a unified 
military-strategic space." 
  The Alma-Ata Declaration also affirmed: "The Combined 
Command 
of military-strategic forces and unified control over nuclear 
weapons will be preserved to ensure international strategic 
stability and security." It was in the Belovezh Agreement that 
the parties guaranteed necessary conditions for stationing, 
functioning, and material and social support of armed forces and 
pledged to follow a coordinated policy in questions of social 
protection and pension support of servicemen and their families. 
  The military security question was brought up for discussion 
of heads of state on 30 December 1991. A very important decision 
which predetermined subsequent development in the 
military-political area was the accord of Commonwealth member 
states on each one's right to establish its own armed forces. 
For Ukraine the beginning of operation of such a right already 
had been established from 3 January 1992. In this connection the 
task was set to consider and decide within a two-month period 
the question of the procedure for command and control of general 
purpose forces and the sequence for Commonwealth states' 
implementation of the right to establish their own armed forces. 
It was proposed to develop--also in a two-month period--a 
mechanism of activity of border guard troops with consideration 
of requirements of the national legislation of Commonwealth 
states. 
  The question of nuclear weapons and strategic forces 
remained 
a very important military security problem in the stage of the 
Commonwealth's origin and formation. It was documents of the 
Belovezh meeting that emphasized the need for unified control 
over nuclear weapons and their nonproliferation. At Alma-Ata 
four states on whose territory nuclear weapons and their 
delivery vehicles were stationed--Belarus, Kazakhstan, Russian 
Federation and Ukraine--signed the Agreement on Joint Measures 
with Respect to Nuclear Weapons. One of the most important 
provisions of this document was that "nuclear weapons which are 
in the combined strategic armed forces ensure the collective 
security of all CIS members." At the same time the question of 
tactical nuclear weapons was resolved: in accordance with 
international understandings, Belarus, Kazakhstan and Ukraine 
pledged to ensure evacuation of such weapons to central preplant 
bases in Russia for their dismantling by 1 July 1992. The 
parties confirmed adherence to principles of nonproliferation of 
nuclear weapons: they pledged not to transfer to anyone 
whomsoever nuclear weapons or other nuclear explosive devices 
and technologies or control over such nuclear and explosive 
devices directly or indirectly; and not to assist, encourage or 
induce any non-nuclear-weapon state to manufacture or acquire 
nuclear weapons. 
  The Agreement on Strategic Forces signed in Minsk on 30 
December 1991 was of great significance. The significance of 
this Agreement is that all Commonwealth member states agreed 
that strategic forces are subject to centralized command and 
control and must be under unified leadership and control of the 
combined command. 
  Gradually the preservation of unified armed forces became 
more and more at odds with the new realities. The previous 
military reform requirements lost urgency with the beginning of 
organizational development of national armies of independent 
states. 
  The Armed Forces leadership advanced the idea of 
transforming 
unified armed forces into combined armed forces under an 
atypical, nonstandard scheme. Its essence was to ensure conduct 
of comprehensive transformations with preservation of the most 
important elements of the common space and of a unified military 
infrastructure within the scope of a transition period of 
necessary and sufficient duration, a minimum of 3-5 years. This 
would allow using the economic, military-technical and strictly 
military advantages of the unified system in the interests of 
all member states and would help protect vital interests of 
servicemen and their families. Also of no less importance was 
that this would not engender reasons for new conflicts, for 
encroachments on good-neighbor relations and cooperation, and 
for militarization of crises. 
  It was proposed that the functions and missions of the 
combined armed forces initially would remain the same as for the 
USSR Armed Forces. Subsequently national armies would be 
established on the basis of formations, units and establishments 
of the combined armed forces while resolving social and legal 
questions of servicemen in Commonwealth states in an agreed upon 
and coordinated manner. All elements of systems common to 
Commonwealth states--command and control, communications, 
reconnaissance, air defense, ABM defense, space defense, 
technical and logistic support, and preparation of theaters of 
military operations--were to be preserved and developed as 
applied to the changed conditions. To a certain extent these 
plans were reflected in documents adopted at the Heads of State 
Council in Minsk on 14 February 1992 and in Kiev on 20 March 
1992. 
  The Minsk meeting essentially concluded the first stage of 
transforming unified armed forces into combined armed forces. 
Marshal of Aviation Ye. I. Shaposhnikov became their commander 
in chief. Three components became part of the Combined Armed 
Forces--strategic forces, general purpose forces and the armed 
forces proper of those states which announced their 
establishment. The General Staff of the USSR Armed Forces and 
other military command and control bodies made up the basis of 
the Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces High Command. 
  In accordance with the Agreement on the Status of Strategic 
Forces (14 February 1992) it was recognized that they function 
as an independent large strategic formation. Leadership of 
Commonwealth Strategic Forces is exercised by the CinC Strategic 
Forces subordinate to the Heads of State Council and to the CinC 
CIS Combined Armed Forces. The Strategic Forces are intended for 
ensuring security of all states parties to the Agreement and are 
maintained through fixed contributions of these states. The 
Agreement was signed on behalf of Azerbaijan, Armenia, Belarus, 
Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Russian Federation, Tajikistan, 
Turkmenistan, Uzbekistan and Ukraine. According to terms of the 
Agreement, each state has the right to secede from it, which 
requires written notification one year in advance. Ukraine 
stipulated the period of its secession in advance--1994. 
  The Agreement on General Purpose Forces (14 February 1992) 
fixed two components of the Combined Armed Forces--combined 
general purpose forces and armed forces proper of Commonwealth 
member states. Large strategic formations, formations, units, 
establishments, military educational institutions, other 
military force elements and military installations not part of 
the CIS Strategic Forces, as well as the member states' own 
armed forces that are operationally subordinate, with their 
consent, to the CIS Combined Armed Forces High Command were 
included among general purpose forces. 
  The line toward establishing a legal basis for the Combined 
Armed Forces was continued at the next meeting in Kiev on 20 
March 1992. The Agreement on Combined Forces for the Transition 
Period defined the Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces as 
consisting of strategic forces and general purpose forces. The 
objectives for establishing the CIS Combined Armed Forces were 
formulated as follows: 

  -  need for mutually acceptable, organized resolution of 
questions on reforming the Armed Forces of the former USSR; 
  -  need for ensuring security of member states, preserving 
command 
and control and preventing conflicts. 

    To support the functioning of the Combined Armed Forces, 
questions were decided in Minsk on 14 February 1992 on forming a 
unified defense budget, on the procedure for financing armed 
forces of Commonwealth states, and on social and legal 
guarantees for servicemen, persons discharged from military 
service and their families; and problems were resolved in Kiev 
on 20 March 1992 on legal foundations of the activity of CIS 
Combined Armed Forces, principles of CIS Combined Armed Forces 
manpower acquisition and performance of duty in them, principles 
of providing CIS member states with arms, military equipment and 
other materiel, principles of organizing RDT&amp;E, and the 
status 
of general purpose forces of the CIS Combined Armed Forces for 
the transition period. 
  It was proposed to include the following kinds of costs in 
the unified defense budget: Upkeep of the Army and Navy; payment 
for arms, military equipment and property, including procurement 
of nuclear munitions; payment for S&amp;T products; capital 
construction and major overhaul, including special and housing 
construction and pension support for servicemen and their 
families. The Agreement on a Unified Defense Budget was signed 
by Armenia, Belarus, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Russian Federation, 
Tajikistan and Turkmenistan. Belarus, Turkmenistan and 
Uzbekistan stipulated nonparticipation in financing nuclear 
weapon procurements. Azerbaijan and Ukraine refused to take part 
in forming the defense budget. These states agreed only to 
participation financing for the upkeep of strategic forces on 
their own territory. 
  The Agreement on Social and Legal Guarantees of Servicemen, 
Persons Discharged from Military Service and Their Families was 
of great importance. Based on the need for adopting agreed-upon 
measures in this matter, the member states decided to preserve 
the level of rights and privileges previously established by 
laws and other legislative instruments of the USSR for the 
category of the aforementioned persons. 
  Decisions of an organizational nature played a role of no 
small importance in realizing the idea of forming the Combined 
Armed Forces: the appointment of Colonel General V. N. Samsonov 
as chief of staff of the CIS Combined Armed Forces, General of 
the Army Yu. P. Maksimov as CinC Strategic Forces, and Colonel 
General V. M. Semenov as CinC General Purpose Forces. 
  Decisions made in Minsk and Kiev proposed to secure the 
existence of the Combined Armed Forces for a rather lengthy 
period, and not just for the transition period (only Belarus 
stipulated the time of the transition period: in some agreements 
one year, in others two years). Such a provision was based on 
Russia's voluntary desire, considering the wishes and plans of 
other independent states, to bear the main burdens connected 
with functioning and transformation of the Armed Forces. 
  Intensification of centrifugal tendencies and a practical 
transition to creation of its own armed forces by Ukraine and 
then also by a number of other independent states called into 
question realization of the plan for establishing combined armed 
forces directly on the basis of the unified armed forces. The 
situation was exacerbated by the fact that essentially the 
entire defense budget in the first quarter of 1992 was covered 
exclusively at the expense of Russia and partially of Ukraine. 
Taking all this into account, Russian President B. N. Yeltsin 
signed the Edict on Establishing the Russian Armed Forces on 7 
May 1992. Russia's role and importance in CIS affairs 
predetermined the influence of this act on the further course of 
military organizational development in the CIS. 
  It is important to bear two factors in mind here. First of 
all, the Russian Armed Forces are the nucleus of the military 
component of Commonwealth defense and security in makeup, 
structure and combat capabilities. Secondly, Russia and its 
Armed Forces represent the main source of help and assistance to 
CIS states in establishing their own armed forces. Of all 
Commonwealth states, only Russia is capable of producing the end 
models of weapons and equipment. Essentially all military 
scientific research institutes are in Russia. Ninety percent of 
aircraft are fabricated on its territory and 80 percent of 
military higher educational institutions are located there. Only 
in Russia is there a General Staff Military Academy where 
military specialists of the top command and control echelon are 
trained. 
  The decision on establishing the Russian Armed Forces 
signified the conclusion to the second stage of military 
organizational development within the Commonwealth framework and 
the beginning of the third stage, whose essence was acquisition 
of state affiliation by troops (naval forces). It was envisaged 
that armed forces of independent states would assign specific 
military contingents to the Combined Armed Forces for 
safeguarding common geostrategic interests, above all the 
"nuclear umbrella," for all parties to collective security. 
  Construction of a collective security system by CIS 
countries 
under present conditions is very original. This is determined by 
the fact that, in entering into a relationship of cooperation 
with each other in the defense area, the new states basically do 
not have their own armies or national military infrastructure, 
but have just begun taking the path of establishing them. The 
decision on forming a Council of Ministers of Defense of 
Commonwealth Member States adopted in Minsk on 14 February 1992 
played an essential role in this connection. The Ministers of 
Defense Council became the supreme collective body of the Heads 
of State Council in questions of military policy and military 
organizational development of member states. Among the most 
important decisions of the Ministers of Defense Council in 1992 
were those on the procedure for mutual transfer of servicemen of 
armed forces of Commonwealth states (Moscow, 3-4 September 
1992), on rules for flights of CIS military aircraft (Moscow, 
3-4 September 1992), on establishing the CIS Combined Armed 
Forces Chiefs of Staff Committee and committees of the CIS 
Combined Armed Forces High Command, and on approving the Statute 
on Deputy Chiefs of Staff of the Combined Armed 
Forces/Representatives of Armed Forces of Commonwealth States 
(Moscow, 4 November 1992). 
  The activity of the Ministers of Defense Council clearly 
demonstrates the desire of CIS heads of state not only to 
preserve the mechanism of armed forces cooperation, but also to 
improve its functioning as a very important element ensuring the 
security of Commonwealth states. 
  Thus the package of documents adopted in Minsk, Alma-Ata and 
Kiev essentially determined basic parameters of collective 
security within the Commonwealth framework. The Collective 
Security Treaty signed in Tashkent in May 1992 concretized its 
features and opened up favorable prospects for joint, 
coordinated resolution of the full diversity of major defense 
problems. The Treaty was initialed by six states--Armenia, 
Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Russian Federation, Tajikistan and 
Uzbekistan. 
  Certain CIS member states which did not sign the Treaty 
argued this as follows. Ukraine and Belarus did not do so 
because of their declaration of neutrality and consequently 
nonparticipation in any kind of blocs. Azerbaijan and Moldova 
are inclined to establish bilateral relations with Commonwealth 
countries. Turkmenistan favors only bilateral relations in the 
military-political area. 
  The military security concept of CIS member states adopted 
in 
Bishkek on 9 October 1992 became the substantive part of the 
collective security system. This is the first document 
reflecting coordinated, officially adopted views on protecting 
against external threats and ensuring independence and political 
stability. Member states pledged not to undertake unilateral 
actions violating provisions of the concept and to take its 
basic provisions into account in following a military policy and 
developing and adopting legislative instruments in matters of 
defense, including also in forming national military doctrines. 
  The prevention of conflicts and resolution of disputes among 
CIS members themselves became a new direction of joint activity 
in the collective security area. Instability in a number of CIS 
areas and the increase in conflicts in some Commonwealth states 
led to the appearance of the idea of establishing a legal basis 
for regulating this problem. At the meeting of heads of state in 
Kiev (March 1992), Kazakhstan President N. Nazarbayev raised the 
question of the need for establishing a mechanism for preventing 
inter-ethnic conflicts in the CIS. In his opinion, multinational 
forces of the Commonwealth could become a means which would bar 
the development of bloody events. 
  The Declaration of Non-Use of Force or Threat of Force in 
Mutual Relations Among CIS Member States was adopted (Kiev, 20 
March 1992). In it, in addition to confirming previous 
obligations, CIS members announced the nondelivery of weapons to 
zones of conflicts and the stopping of attacks on military units 
and installations for seizing weapons; pledged to refrain from 
organizing or encouraging the organization of irregular armed 
units, including those made up of mercenaries; pledged to 
encourage various forms of people's diplomacy and public 
initiative to avert the threat of interstate conflicts; and 
pledged to support efforts of the international community and 
its institutions to settle conflicts on territory of 
Commonwealth states. 
  The Declaration cites a detailed list of nonmilitary 
(political) measures to be used for fair resolution of disputes 
among Commonwealth states: 

  -  negotiations; 
  -  investigation; 
  -  mediation; 
  -  reconciliation; 
  -  arbitration; 
  -  legal proceedings. 

    It also was proposed to use principles, provisions and rules 
of another nature developed by the United Nations and CSCE. 
  The Declaration on the Situation in Left-Bank Areas of the 
Republic of Moldova also became important in this connection; it 
emphasized CIS interest in preserving Moldova's territorial 
integrity and promised to take steps against involvement of 
mercenaries from the CIS in the conflict, against the supply of 
weapons to opposing sides, and against conduct of propaganda in 
the mass media promoting an escalation of the conflict. 
  The decision of the Heads of State Council, made at the 
request of Azerbaijan and Armenia, on its resolve to send a team 
of observers and collective peacekeeping forces to the Karabakh 
conflict zone after a cease-fire agreement was reached between 
them there also was confirmation of readiness for political 
cooperation within the CIS framework. 
  The CIS Charter registered in a concentrated form the 
provisions of basic documents in the security area adopted in 
the CIS during 1991-1992. 
  In it the member states affirmed that they are following a 
coordinated policy in the area of international security, 
disarmament, arms control and armed forces organizational 
development and are maintaining security in the Commonwealth. In 
accordance with the Charter, use of military force, including 
peacemaking operations and use of armed forces if necessary, is 
done together in case a threat arises to the sovereignty, 
security and territorial integrity of one or more member states 
or to international peace. 
  Every Commonwealth member state which signed the Charter 
pledged to take appropriate steps to ensure a stable situation 
on external borders of Commonwealth member states and to 
coordinate the activity of border guard troops and other 
services responsible for compliance with the established 
procedure for crossing external borders of CIS member states. 
  The Charter also includes questions of preventing conflicts 
and resolving disputes. The parties agreed to take all steps to 
prevent conflicts, above all on an inter-ethnic and 
interconfessional basis; to refrain from actions capable of 
harming other member states and leading to exacerbation of 
possible disputes; to make efforts for peaceful resolution of 
disputes through talks or by achieving an understanding about an 
appropriate alternative procedure for settling a dispute. 
  An analysis of approaches to collective security in the CIS 
shows that involvement of the independent countries in military 
and defense cooperation is expressed in various forms. Six 
states parties to the Collective Security Treaty make up the 
nucleus of collective military-political cooperation. CIS 
founding states which ratify the Commonwealth Charter within a 
year can be added to them. A considerable number of 
military-political questions concerning not only division of the 
USSR's legacy, but also creation of a foundation for 
military-political relations on a new basis are decided by the 
Ministers of Defense Council and Chiefs of Staff Committee. 
Military-political ties are developing on a bilateral basis. 
Thus, multilevel military-political integration and diversity of 
forms and methods of cooperation in the security area are 
showing up more and more clearly. 
  Our own history knows such forms of military cooperation as 
military-political coordination of objectives and positions of 
allies, strategic interworking of independent armies, 
operational subordination of national troops to a unified 
command, tactical communications and interworking of military 
force elements, and organizational unity of the performance of 
duty by soldiers of different countries. Essentially all these 
forms are manifested in or are being put into the activity of 
Commonwealth states. The diversity of interstate ties leads to 
the appearance of different schemes of military-political 
leadership, but all of them presume the generally recognized 
principles, objectives, and missions of states parties to the 
CIS. 
<H5>  Part 3 - Objectives and Principles of Military Cooperation </H5>
  Military cooperation of CIS member countries presumes a 
closeness or coincidence of their national interests which 
contributes to unification of efforts in the defense area, 
including a joint assessment of military danger, formation of 
objectives and principles of defense organizational development 
and military cooperation, and mutual obligations in the area of 
ensuring security. 
  Experience built up by the CIS in the time of its existence 
indicates that the dividing up of armed forces and the entire 
defense infrastructure permitted laying down foundations for 
national armed forces. Simultaneously there was an abrupt slump 
in the level of troop combat readiness, defense capability, and 
internal and external security of independent states on the 
whole. It is obvious that sovereignty represents no more than a 
declaration without reliable assurance of internal stability and 
external security. The reality is such that in the foreseeable 
future essentially not one Commonwealth state will be able to 
ensure its own security individually, independently of each 
other, above all the military-economic, military-technical and 
strictly military aspects of such security. It is not just that 
effectiveness of isolated defense and security systems that rely 
exclusively on national resources, needs and interests hardly is 
attainable in principle under contemporary conditions; it also 
is wasteful and irrational and is so burdensome on the economy 
of a state just getting on its feet, especially a small one, 
that it may undermine and block its movement along the path of 
democratic transformations and progress. 
  Life persuasively showed the CIS states that their genuine 
independence can be guaranteed only by establishing a solid 
economic alliance and a collective military security system, 
within the framework of which it would be possible to resolve 
defense problems common to all, beginning with military 
legislation, technical outfitting and training of national 
armies and combined armed forces and ending with legal and 
social protection of servicemen and their families. 
  Fundamentals of a common military security system were laid 
down by the Collective Security Treaty signed by the heads of 
six CIS states--Armenia, Kazakhstan, Russia, Tajikistan, 
Turkmenistan and Uzbekistan--at a Tashkent meeting on 15 May 
1992. 
  The draft of this document was introduced for consideration 
by Russia, Kazakhstan and Uzbekistan. Initially its content was 
prepared only for these three states within the framework of 
friendship and mutual assistance treaties. Later the collective 
security idea was supported by other CIS members. 
  The Treaty represents a political and legal basis for 
forming 
a defense alliance of independent Commonwealth states. Its 
parties confirmed basic principles of their foreign policy. 
After emphasizing the desire to live in peace both with each 
other as well as with other states, they undertook to refrain 
from using force or threat of force in interstate relations and 
from joining military alliances or taking part in any kind of 
groupings as well as in actions directed against another member 
state. The readiness of states parties to the Treaty to change 
the content of the document in case of the establishment of a 
unified security system on the Euro-Asiatic continent as part of 
a worldwide system attests to the peaceful and defensive 
direction of the Treaty and the desire to ensure not only 
regional, but also global security. 
  The Treaty proceeds from the fact that in case of the 
appearance of a threat to security, territorial integrity and 
sovereignty of one or more member states, or a threat to 
international peace and security, the mechanism of joint 
consultations will begin to operate for coordinating positions 
and taking steps to eliminate the threat at hand. A Collective 
Security Council made up of the heads of member states and the 
CinC CIS Combined Armed Forces is established for these 
purposes. The Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces High Command 
coordinates the activity of armed forces of member states until 
Council bodies are established. 
  Collective defense obligations of the parties make up the 
heart of the Treaty. All member states agreed to consider an 
armed attack on one as aggression against all. In this case each 
member state will take steps to assist the country which has 
come under attack. This corresponds to Article 51 of the UN 
Charter, in accordance with which each state has an inalienable 
right to individual or collective self-defense until the 
Security Council has taken measures necessary to maintain 
international peace and security. The decision on use of armed 
forces for repelling aggression is made by the heads of member 
states. The Treaty does not preclude the possibility of using 
armed forces outside the territory of member states, but 
presumes that this can be done exclusively in the interests of 
international security, in strict conformity with the UN Charter 
and legislation of member states. 
  The Treaty does not affect rights and obligations under 
other 
bilateral and multilateral treaties and agreements in force 
concluded by member states with other states, nor is it directed 
against third countries. It is open to all states interested in 
acceding to it which share its objectives and principles. Its 
effective period is five years with subsequent extension. It 
enters into force immediately after instruments of ratification 
are surrendered for safekeeping by signatory states parties. 
  Principles of equality, mutual respect and independence, as 
determining factors in mutual relations of states parties, were 
manifested in the desire, rarely fixed legally in treaties, to 
resolve together any questions which arise among them relative 
to interpretation or application of any provision in a spirit of 
friendship, mutual respect and mutual understanding. No less 
important is the fact that not one state which signed the Treaty 
was deprived of its rights in favor of another state and no one 
received any kind of benefits or advantages at another's 
expense. The entire content of the Treaty is aimed at ensuring 
sovereignty and independence of each party through their joint 
efforts. 
  History knows many examples of military cooperation of 
states 
and armies. Its character, forms and content have been quite 
varied in different historical eras, but the vitality of these 
alliances was determined by those objectives for whose 
accomplishment they were established. For Commonwealth member 
states it is not only the historical commonality of their 
peoples, economic and political interdependence, and a unified 
economic space that are unifying, but also defensive missions 
which coincide in terms of objectives, a common military 
heritage and a preserved common military-strategic space. 
  A very important political objective of the Commonwealth is 
to ensure military security of the CIS as a whole and of each 
member individually. This objective also is fixed in the 
military security concept adopted in Bishkek on 9 October 1992 
and signed by states parties to the Collective Security Treaty. 
  The concept sets forth coordinated views on defense of 
Commonwealth member states against external threats and on 
assurance of their independence, territorial integrity and 
political stability. The concept includes fundamentals of 
military policy and collective defense of Commonwealth member 
states, including basic principles of their nuclear policy and 
of the organizational development and evolution of the 
Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces. It reflects the commonality 
of security objectives and is based on fundamental provisions of 
documents adopted by heads of Commonwealth states on military 
questions and fundamental aims of their military doctrines. The 
concept incorporates provisions on barring wars as the main 
direction of military-political activity and on the agreement of 
member states that they do not regard a single state or 
coalition of states as their enemy in the political and military 
sense and consider all countries of the world community as 
partners with whom relations must be built on generally 
recognized principles and rules of international law, friendship 
and cooperation. The idea of omnipotence of military force is 
rejected and the future of Commonwealth states is not linked 
with military resolution of international problems. 
  In developing policy in the military security area, member 
states proceed from the assumption that the threat of a world 
war breaking out with use of nuclear weapons is unlikely. The 
trend toward a diminishing possibility of the outbreak of a 
large-scale conventional war has stabilized. At the same time 
the danger of the outbreak of various military and other 
conflicts and of local wars on their basis remains. There also 
are a number of potential dangers connected in part with outside 
support to forces whose actions may be aimed at undermining CIS 
solidarity; with proliferation of nuclear and other kinds of 
mass destruction weapons and their delivery vehicles; with 
international terrorist acts connected above all with the arms 
and drug trade, which may serve as the cause of armed conflicts; 
and with the unresolved nature of internal problems and 
political and social instability in some Commonwealth states. 
These dangers may be aggravated significantly by outside 
intervention in internal affairs of Commonwealth member states. 
  CIS member states consider the following to be basic sources 
of military danger: from the standpoint of 
intentions--instability of the socioeconomic and 
military-political situation in a number of regions; from the 
standpoint of capabilities--the presence of powerful combat 
groupings of strategic offensive forces, ground troops, and air 
and naval forces in contiguous and other states whose combat 
potential, despite planned reductions, remains sufficient to 
view it as an important potential military threat to 
Commonwealth security. The possibility of proliferation of 
nuclear and other kinds of mass destruction weapons in the world 
represents a constant danger to CIS member countries. 
  In the more distant future the level of military danger will 
be determined by a global regrouping of forces, the outlines of 
which are visible as a result of the dynamics of political, 
economic, cultural-ethnic and military-technical development of 
the United States, Japan, China, India and Russia; creation of a 
unified Europe; and formation of new states in the European East 
and in Asia. A change in the assessment of the nature of 
military danger is possible in this period. 
  A fundamental feature of the military security concept lies 
in a precise delimitation of ways, methods and means of 
implementing military policy in peace and wartime. 
  In peacetime Commonwealth efforts are aimed at ensuring a 
phased reduction (limitation) of military threats and 
strengthening stability in the CIS and the world; and at taking 
steps to prevent wars between states and civil wars from 
breaking out and to raise the level of confidence and openness 
in the military area. In solving these problems Commonwealth 
member states intend to proceed from the priority of exclusively 
peaceful, conciliatory means in settling controversial problems, 
international crises, and regional and local interstate military 
conflicts; from the need to exclude from practice all forms of 
discrimination and economic or any other methods of pressure; 
and from the need for taking consistent, effective steps to 
fight international and internal terrorism and safeguard human 
rights. 
  Repelling aggression from outside and inflicting such damage 
on an aggressor in defense of the freedom, sovereignty and 
territorial integrity of states belonging to the Commonwealth 
that would force him to stop military operations become the 
Commonwealth objective in wartime. 
  In relations with each other Commonwealth member states 
intend to act on the basis of mutual recognition and respect of 
state sovereignty, the inalienable right to self-determination, 
and the principle of equal rights, and they reject use of 
military force or threat of force as a method of achieving 
political, economic and other objectives. They take into account 
that under present conditions any local conflict may lead to 
catastrophic consequences both on a regional as well as a global 
plane. 
  The set of principles forming the basis of the military 
security concept includes above all recognition of the need to 
preserve peace as a priority value. In this connection 
Commonwealth member states are full of resolve to comply with 
adopted declarations on sovereignty and acts on independence, 
they guarantee inviolability of existing borders and 
nonintervention in internal affairs of other states, and they 
intend to apply efforts toward nonproliferation of nuclear 
weapons and other kinds of mass destruction weapons as well as 
their delivery vehicles. 
  The principle of non-first use of military force is no less 
important. Commonwealth member states proclaimed resolve never 
to be first to begin military operations against any state under 
any circumstances if they themselves do not become the targets 
of armed attack. The pledge on non-first use of nuclear and 
other mass destruction weapons also was confirmed. 
  The principle of collective security is becoming a very 
important principle of ensuring national-state security for CIS 
countries. Two aspects are singled out in this regard: the 
priority nature of collective decisions and measures for 
ensuring military security of Commonwealth member states; 
assistance in strengthening international security systems and 
adjusting cooperation in political and military matters with the 
North Atlantic Alliance and other alliances and with all 
countries of the world community; and involvement in 
international actions carried out in accordance with the UN 
Charter. 
  The intention to ensure strategic stability in the world by 
political and military methods is a principle of extraordinarily 
great importance for shaping the Commonwealth's 
military-political course. This signifies a desire to achieve 
that state of military-political relations where not one party 
should have any incentives to initiate combat operations against 
another party or to develop new, major programs or acquire arms 
in order to avoid a situation unfavorable to itself. 
  The intention of Commonwealth member states to reliably 
ensure their defense capability along paths of organizational 
development both of the armed forces of an individual country as 
well as of the Combined Armed Forces within limits of reasonable 
sufficiency is linked directly with ensuring stability at an 
international level. This is to be done by acting in three 
directions: 

  -  by using nuclear deterrence, which should be accomplished 
by the minimum potential of Commonwealth strategic nuclear 
forces necessary for this objective and, with implementation of 
the START I Treaty, by the Russian Federation; 
  -  by retaining a sufficient potential of their own armies for 
defense and forces to avert local conflicts on external 
Commonwealth borders; 
  -  by having the opportunity to localize in regions in a short 
time any manifestations of instability connected with operations 
of illegal force elements representing a threat to peace. 

    In the area of ensuring internal security, relying on the 
priority of peaceful means to resolve controversial problems, 
Commonwealth member states intend to continue to develop and 
implement coordinated practical steps on a bilateral and 
multilateral basis aimed at establishing within the CIS 
framework an atmosphere of peace, stability and confidence among 
states, and localization of internal threats and, in case armed 
conflicts arise on their basis, aimed at terminating them 
rapidly and bloodlessly. 
  Conflicts which have arisen on an interconfessional, 
inter-ethnic and political basis on territory of any 
Commonwealth state are to be settled or they are to be prevented 
by using military observer teams and collective peacekeeping 
forces in the CIS. 
  A component part of the CIS military security concept is a 
set of views on collective defense. The defensive direction of 
these views is determined by the fact that they are based on the 
following provisions: 

  -  rejection of first initiation of military operations and 
of establishment of large-scale troop groupings in peacetime for 
conducting offensive operations; 
  -  excluding any kind of military measures and actions of a 
preventive nature aimed at achieving military advantage before 
aggression is committed; 
  -  strict compliance with UN principles, human rights, treaties, 
agreements and other international acts on nonproliferation of 
nuclear weapons, on disarmament, and aimed at maintaining peace 
and security; 
  -  openness of the content of doctrinal documents; 
  -  possibility of creating effective mechanisms for peacetime 
monitoring of military activities. 

    Missions of the Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces are 
determined based on the following fundamental provisions: 

  -  need for preserving peace; 
  -  non-first use of military force and nuclear weapons; 
  -  observance of the right of each Commonwealth member state to 
use its own armed forces in accordance with international 
treaties and agreements for restoring peace in various regions; 
  -  nonintervention in internal affairs of other countries; 
  -  openness of military-political activity; 
  -  advance preparation of troops (forces), territory and 
population; 
  -  unified technology for manufacturing arms and military 
equipment; 
  -  establishment of troop groupings and a unified air and 
aerospace defense system; 
  -  maintaining constant readiness to employ nuclear weapons. 

    Missions of the Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces in the 
area of collective defense include the following: 

  -  preventing war by nuclear deterrence of a potential enemy; 
  -  providing timely information about imminent aggression and 
maintaining high combat readiness of alert forces and assets and 
of battle management and support systems; 
  -  warning of the beginning of a missile attack on land, at sea, 
in the air and in space; 
  -  repelling a surprise aerospace attack and defending the 
principal administrative-political and industrial centers and 
other important installations; 
  -  repelling an enemy attack from land, sea and air, holding 
very 
important areas of CIS territory and routing enemy groups which 
have invaded; 
  -  compelling the enemy to terminate combat operations and 
mopping 
up in the aftermath of aggression; 
  -  weakening the enemy military-economic potential; 
  -  keeping and restoring peace together with armed forces of 
other 
states in accordance with international treaties and the UN 
Charter; 
  -  assisting the population in mopping up in the aftermath of 
catastrophes and natural disasters. 

    Political objectives of a possible war and specific missions 
for conducting military operations, above all in its initial 
period, are the basis for planning use of the Commonwealth 
Combined Armed Forces. The Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces 
above all prepare for retaliatory actions based on the defensive 
direction of military policy of Commonwealth member states, 
which rejects use of force or threat of force for resolving any 
controversial international problems including armed conflicts, 
as long as the territory of any Commonwealth sovereign state is 
not subjected to direct aggression. This provision relates to 
the beginning of warfare. After aggression has been committed 
they are oriented toward choosing forms and methods of warfare 
which must correspond to the situation at hand and ensure 
seizing the strategic initiative and defeating the aggressor. 
Therefore the Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces must be ready 
to conduct defensive, offensive and other kinds of combat 
operations with any variant of the initiation and conduct of war 
under conditions of the use of contemporary and advanced weapons. 
  There is a procedure for performance of combat missions by 
strategic forces using nuclear weapons only in retaliatory 
actions, and by Aerospace Defense Troops within the scope of the 
combined aerospace defense system of Commonwealth member states. 
The Aerospace Defense Troops, which include air defense and 
missile-space defense systems and Aerospace Forces, are called 
upon to provide timely warning of an air, missile and space 
attack, protection of unified air space borders, most effective 
employment of armed forces of Commonwealth member states, and 
cover for state and military command and control facilities, 
troops, reserves and the most important 
administrative-industrial and other installations. Employment of 
air defense and missile-space defense troops and forces is to be 
organized throughout CIS territory under a unified concept and 
plan. The air defense system is structured on a territorial 
principle with precise division into zones and areas. Use of the 
Aerospace Forces is accomplished on treaty terms with 
Commonwealth member states on whose territory they are stationed. 
  The Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces and armed forces of 
Commonwealth member states are in readiness to conduct all kinds 
of combat operations (defensive or offensive) in any variant of 
the initiation of war (armed conflict, local war, large-scale 
conventional war, nuclear war). They can be used fully or 
partially. 
  The CIS Combined Armed Forces and armed forces of 
Commonwealth member states must be thoroughly trained for joint 
performance of missions in the unified military-strategic space. 
<H5>  Part 4 - Organization of Multilateral Cooperation in the CIS </H5>
  The problem of organizing cooperation among CIS member 
states 
is of special importance by virtue of the special form of 
association they proclaimed: the Commonwealth is neither a state 
nor a suprastate formation. In this connection the very first 
agreements fixed the intent to accomplish interworking on the 
principle of equal rights through coordinating institutions 
formed on a parity basis. 
<H5>  4.1. The Commonwealth Coordinating Bodies </H5>
  The Heads of State Council and Heads of Government Council 
became coordinating bodies in accordance with the Provisional 
Agreement dated 30 December 1991. The Ministers of Defense 
Council was added to them in February 1992, and the CIS Combined 
Armed Forces High Command in March 1992 (Diagram 2). 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-005LC-28A>           Diagram 2 - Supreme CIS bodies </FIG>





    The powers of these bodies were extremely broad in the 
period 
of existence of the former USSR's Armed Forces as a unified 
body. Under the Agreement on Powers of Supreme CIS Bodies in 
Defense Matters signed 20 March 1992 by Armenia, Belarus, 
Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Russian Federation, Tajikistan and 
Uzbekistan, their essence reduced to the following. 
  The Heads of State Council was recognized as and 
is the supreme Commonwealth body in defense matters. Its terms 
of reference included development and implementation of 
Commonwealth military policy; determination of the collective 
defense concept and basic directions of military organizational 
development; adoption of Commonwealth military doctrine and 
nuclear strategy; development of the decisionmaking procedure 
for use of nuclear weapons, a system of measures precluding 
their unsanctioned use, and the procedure for exercising unified 
control over nuclear weapons and other kinds of mass destruction 
weapons; determination of the amount of appropriations of 
material-technical resources for defense and upkeep of the 
Combined Armed Forces; determination of the Combined Armed 
Forces makeup and structure and establishment of the procedure 
for performance of military duty in the Combined Armed Forces; 
and approval of plans for development, mobilization and 
employment of the Combined Armed Forces in wartime. 
  In accordance with the Agreement on Powers, the Heads of 
State Council makes decisions on instituting and cancelling 
martial law throughout Commonwealth territory in case of 
aggression or threat of aggression against the Commonwealth; on 
declaring war, terminating a state of war and concluding peace; 
and on conducting military operations; and other decisions on 
the most important defense matters. Decisions of the Heads of 
State Council are made on a consensus basis. 
  As fixed in the Agreement on Powers of Supreme CIS Bodies in 
Defense Matters, the Heads of Government Council 
coordinates military-economic activity. In accordance with the 
situation which existed in the spring of 1992 it was determined 
that the Heads of Government Council submits the Commonwealth's 
draft unified defense budget to the Heads of State Council; 
draws up, together with the Combined Armed Forces High Command, 
a coordinated program for arms and military equipment 
development for the Combined Armed Forces for the corresponding 
period; draws up the amount of financing of the indicated 
program within limits of appropriations for defense and upkeep 
of the Commonwealth Combined Forces and priorities for 
fulfilling military orders; establishes the procedure for 
accepting arms, military equipment and other military property 
for the Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces into the inventory 
(for supply, for operation) and the procedure for logistic 
support of the Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces; determines 
the procedure for accomplishing RDT&amp;E in the defense area; 
through appropriate bodies of independent states, provides for 
outfitting the Combined Armed Forces with arms, military 
equipment and other supplies and for providing them with 
necessary services; coordinates annual contingents of citizens 
subject to call-up for military service in the Combined Armed 
Forces and the annual number of militarily trained specialists 
subject to training and refresher training; draws up 
mobilization plans for the national economy and plans for 
stockpiling materiel resources of the mobilization reserve; 
establishes assignments for preparation and transfer to the 
Combined Armed Forces of means of transportation, communications 
and other resources with the declaration of mobilization and in 
wartime, and other mobilization assignments; makes decisions on 
establishment (retention), development and the procedure for 
using defense installations and lines of communication, 
communication networks and transportation on territory of member 
states in support of collective defense, and also the command 
and control system in the Combined Armed Forces; makes decisions 
on matters of social and legal guarantees and monetary, 
material, housing/everyday services and pension support for CIS 
Combined Armed Forces servicemen, persons discharged from 
military duty and members of their families, as well as families 
of servicemen who perished (died) in performance of official 
duties. 
  Functions of the Ministers of Defense Council are 
considered further on in the text. 
  The transition from organizational development of CIS 
Combined Armed Forces based on unified armed forces to their 
organizational development based on establishment of national 
armed forces, which led to signing of the Collective Security 
Treaty, contributed to the appearance of a draft establishing 
the Collective Security Council. In fulfillment of 
the Collective Security Treaty, heads of states parties to the 
Treaty approved the Statute on the Collective Security Council 
at a session of the Heads of State Council in Moscow on 6 July 
1992. The Statute specified that the Council is the supreme 
political body of states parties to the Collective Security 
Treaty and it provides for coordination and joint activity of 
member states for fulfilling the given Treaty. 
  The primary form of Council activity consists of sessions, 
which are held as necessary, but at least twice a year. Special 
sessions are convened at the request of at least two Council 
members. Council members possess equal rights in making 
decisions. Council decisions are made in accordance with 
regulations established individually for each session, and they 
enter into force for each member state in accordance with its 
constitutional procedures. 
  The Council includes heads of states parties to the 
Collective Security Treaty and the CinC CIS Combined Armed 
Forces. 
  A General (Executive) Secretary of the Council is appointed 
from among civilians by decision of the Collective Security 
Council, and the CinC Armed Forces of States Parties to the 
Collective Security Treaty also is appointed by decision of the 
Collective Security Council; performance of his duties can be 
assigned to the CinC Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces. 
  The Statute specifies powers of the Collective Security 
Council General Secretary, among which is holding political 
consultations and coordinating positions on military matters 
with Council member states; chairing Collective Security Council 
sessions; and proposing questions for discussion and decisions. 
In addition, the General Secretary represents the Collective 
Security Council in relations with heads of state, international 
organizations and the mass media and, upon Council 
authorization, represents general interests in coordination and 
cooperation with NATO and other military-political groupings, 
blocs and alliances; provides political assistance and 
organizational help in establishing and strengthening national 
armed forces of Collective Security Council member states; and 
directs the work of the Council Secretariat. 
  The Statute on the Collective Security Council specifies its 
powers. It considers questions connected with ensuring 
fulfillment of the Treaty; holds consultations to coordinate the 
positions of member states in case of the appearance of a threat 
to security, territorial inviolability and sovereignty of one or 
more member states or a threat to peace and international 
security; develops measures for upgrading defense management of 
member states; examines questions of granting necessary aid, 
including military aid, to a member state which has been 
subjected to aggression on the part of any state or group of 
states; establishes and takes steps which it shall find 
necessary for maintaining or restoring peace and security; 
coordinates the activity of member states along basic directions 
of mobilization preparation of armed forces and economic 
structures; develops recommendations on basic directions of 
military-technical policy and outfitting of armed forces of 
member states with arms and military equipment. 
  It is apparent from the list of these powers that in 
accordance with the Statute on the Collective Security Council, 
it is assigned a portion of the functions which previously were 
to be assigned both to the Heads of State Council and to the 
Heads of Government Council. 
  The CIS Combined Armed Forces High Command came out with the 
initiative of supplementing the military structure (the High 
Command proper) with a political structure coupled closely with 
it, i.e., realizing the concept contained in the Statute of 
creating a political part of the Council in the person of a 
political leader. This means that the General (Executive) 
Secretary of the Council would be elected and would be 
responsible for conducting military policy on behalf of and upon 
authorization of the Collective Security Council, and the CinC 
CIS Combined Armed Forces would focus on organizing the 
functioning of the Combined Armed Forces. It is also proposed to 
change the makeup of the Collective Security Council by 
including in it not only heads of state, but also heads of 
government, chairmen of the Ministers of Defense Council and 
Ministers of Foreign Affairs Council, and the General 
(Executive) Secretary. 
  Possible coordination of efforts of CIS states in the 
military-political area is shown in Diagram 3. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-005LC-31A>           Diagram 3. Possible makeup of </FIG>





    As indicated above, the Collective Security Council was 
signed by six states. The Statute on the Collective Security 
Council is in effect from the moment the Collective Security 
Treaty enters into force. In case other states accede to the 
Treaty, their heads are included in the Council without any kind 
of additional procedures. It is indicative that the Statute on 
the Collective Security Council was signed not only by 
representatives of Armenia, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Russia, 
Tajikistan and Uzbekistan, but also Belarus, Moldova, 
Turkmenistan and Ukraine. 
  Adoption of the CIS Charter and results of the meeting of 
heads of state in May 1993 became an important stage in forming 
the structure of multilateral cooperation in the CIS. 
  The interrelationship of Commonwealth coordination bodies in 
accordance with the CIS Charter and documents of the 14 May 
Moscow meeting are shown in Diagram 4. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-005LC-32A>           Diagram 4. CIS coordination </FIG>





    The Heads of State Council was confirmed by the 
CIS Charter as the supreme body of the Commonwealth. It has been 
determined that the Heads of State Council, in which all member 
states are represented at the highest level, discusses and 
decides fundamental questions connected with member states' 
activity in the sphere of their common interests, i.e., 
questions of cooperation in the area of defense policy and 
security of external borders. 
  The CIS Charter specifies that the Heads of State Council 
assembles for sessions twice a year. Special sessions of the 
Council may be convened at the initiative of one of the member 
states. 
  Under the Commonwealth Charter, the Heads of Government 
Council coordinates the cooperation of member states' 
executive authorities in economic, social and other spheres of 
common interests. Thus, the defense sphere is not especially 
singled out here, although military-economic questions obviously 
are impossible to decide without the heads of government. 
  It is proposed that the Heads of Government Council assemble 
for sessions four times a year. Special sessions of the Council 
may be convened at the initiative of the government of one of 
the Commonwealth member states. 
  The Charter specifies the procedure for decisionmaking by 
the 
Heads of State Council and Heads of Government Council: 
decisions are made by common consent, by consensus. It is 
important to note here that any state may declare its 
impartiality in a particular matter, which should not be viewed 
as an obstacle to decisionmaking. 
  The Heads of State Council and Heads of Government Council 
may hold joint sessions. Both councils may establish working and 
subsidiary bodies both on a permanent as well as an interim 
basis. 
  Statutes on the Ministers of Foreign Affairs Council, 
Ministers of Defense Council, Council of Commanders in Chief of 
Border Guard Troops and the Coordination-Consultative Committee 
became important organizational aspects of the CIS Charter. 
  The Ministers of Foreign Affairs Council is a body 
which coordinates foreign policy activity of member states based 
on decisions of the Heads of State Council and the Heads of 
Government Council, including their activity in international 
organizations, and which organizes consultations in matters of 
world policy representing mutual interests. 
  In contrast to the Ministers of Foreign Affairs Council, the 
Ministers of Defense Council and Council of Commanders in Chief 
of Border Guard Troops are bodies of the Heads of State Council. 
  The Ministers of Defense Council is responsible 
for questions of military policy and military organizational 
development of member states. The Combined Armed Forces High 
Command exercises direct leadership of the Combined Armed Forces 
(see below for more detail on these bodies). 
  The Council of Commanders in Chief of Border Guard 
Troops is responsible for questions of security of external 
borders of Commonwealth member states and assurance of a stable 
situation on them. 
  Establishment of the Coordination-Consultative Committee and 
the Secretariat under it as envisaged in the CIS Charter took 
shape in the course of the 14 May 1993 Moscow meeting of heads 
of state as the establishment of somewhat different structures. 
According to the CIS Charter, the Committee develops and makes 
proposals on questions of cooperation within the Commonwealth 
framework and of development of socioeconomic ties; promotes 
realization of understandings in specific directions of economic 
relationships; organizes conferences of representatives and 
experts for preparing draft documents to be submitted for 
sessions of the Heads of State Council and Heads of Government 
Council; supports sessions of the Heads of State Council and 
Heads of Government Council; and assists in the work of other 
Commonwealth bodies. 
  In accordance with a decision of the Heads of State Council 
of 14 May 1993, not a Coordination-Consultative Committee, but a 
Consultative-Coordination Committee of the Councils of 
Heads of State and Heads of Government of the CIS is being 
established. The Committee is assigned functions of coordinating 
the activity of economic regulation in member countries, 
interstate coordination of economic reforms, and documentary 
formalization of the process of establishing an economic 
alliance. The Committee consists of vice premiers of interested 
Commonwealth states. The post of Committee chairman is occupied 
on a rotating basis by representatives of member countries. 
Russian Vice Premier Aleksandr Shokhin has fulfilled duties of 
chairman for the first six months in 1993. 
  At this same meeting of heads of states members of the 
Commonwealth, the Working Group of Councils of Heads of State 
and Heads of Government was reorganized as the CIS 
Executive Secretariat, an independent body whose functions 
include both preparing materials for sessions of councils of 
Heads of State and Heads of Government as well as collecting 
information on fulfillment of decisions adopted. Ivan 
Korotchenya was appointed CIS Executive Secretary. 
  In accordance with the CIS Charter, an Economic 
Court was established, operating to ensure fulfillment of 
economic obligations within the Commonwealth framework. Its 
purview includes resolution of disputes arising in fulfillment 
of economic obligations. The Court also may decide other 
disputes coming under its purview by agreement of member states. 
Belarusian Minister of Justice Leonid Dashuk was appointed 
president of the Economic Court. 
  Based on agreement of Commonwealth member states about 
cooperation in the economic, social and other areas, 
bodies of branch cooperation may be established which 
develop coordinated principles and rules of such cooperation and 
promote their practical realization. Bodies of branch 
cooperation (councils, committees) perform functions prescribed 
in the CIS Charter and in statutes on them, ensuring 
consideration of and a decision on questions of cooperation in 
appropriate areas on a multilateral basis. The bodies of branch 
cooperation include heads of corresponding executive authorities 
of Commonwealth member states. Bodies of branch cooperation 
adopt recommendations within limits of their terms of reference, 
and in necessary cases also submit proposals for consideration 
of the Heads of Government Council. 
  Activity within the framework of the Interparliamentary 
Assembly is one of the most important directions of 
cooperation in the CIS. The Agreement on the Interparliamentary 
Assembly was signed in Alma-Ata on 27 March 1992 at a 
consultative meeting of heads of supreme soviets (parliaments) 
of CIS member states. The parties approved the Assembly as a 
consultative institution for discussion of a wide range of 
political and socioeconomic questions and for consideration of 
draft documents of common interest. 
  Section VII "Interparliamentary Cooperation" of the CIS 
Charter specifies powers and forms of activity of the 
Interparliamentary Assembly. Article 36 notes that the 
Interparliamentary Assembly conducts interparliamentary 
consultations, discusses questions of cooperation within the 
Commonwealth framework, and develops joint proposals in the 
sphere of activity of national parliaments. 
  Three plenary sessions of the Interparliamentary Assembly of 
CIS member states were held: in Bishkek during 15-16 September 
1992 and in St. Petersburg during 28-29 December 1992 and on 23 
May 1993. 
  According to Regulations adopted in Bishkek, the 
Interparliamentary Assembly consists of parliamentary 
delegations. Delegation heads form the Interparliamentary 
Assembly Council, which carries out practical organization of 
its work. It was decided to hold routine plenary sessions at 
least twice a year. 
  The Interparliamentary Assembly forms permanent or interim 
commissions and other bodies from among representatives of 
parliamentary delegations for preliminary consideration and 
preparation of questions coming under its purview. Decisions are 
made in the form of declarations, addresses, recommendations and 
proposals which the Assembly sends to the Heads of State Council 
or Heads of Government Council. 
  Working bodies of the Interparliamentary Assembly also have 
been formed. A Council was established and its chairman elected. 
Ruslan Khasbulatov, chairman of the Russian Federation Supreme 
Soviet, became the chairman. 
  Five permanent commissions--legal matters, economics and 
finances, social policy and human rights, environmental 
problems, and security matters--are called upon to be important 
working bodies of the Interparliamentary Assembly. 
  St. Petersburg was specified as the residence of the 
Interparliamentary Assembly. 
  According to results of the first plenary session in 
Bishkek, 
the Interparliamentary Assembly adopted a declaration on social 
protection of citizens, approved the Basic Directions for 
Convergence of National Legislation, deemed it advisable to 
begin drawing up recommended legislative measures, approved the 
Provisional Statute on the Interparliamentary 
Information-Reference Service, and addressed international 
parliamentary organizations with a proposal to establish and 
develop broad cooperation. Special addresses were adopted in 
connection with the difficult situation in Tajikistan and 
Abkhazia. 
  At the second plenary session of the Interparliamentary 
Assembly in St. Petersburg, pressing questions of the 
development of cooperation of Commonwealth states were 
considered and important decisions were made. On questions of 
strengthening cooperation in the defense area, the Assembly 
deemed it necessary to implement agreements in this area and 
draw up legal foundations of military organizational development 
in Commonwealth states, as well as to prepare proposals for 
increasing the defense capability of CIS countries. 
  At the third plenary session the Interparliamentary Assembly 
adopted a block of recommended measures on political, economic 
and humanitarian matters. Among measures of a recommended nature 
adopted at the session were decrees on general principles of 
legal regulation of customs affairs and foreign investments, on 
regulating information relations, and on fighting organized 
crime. The memorandum "On Accord for the Sake of Security" was 
adopted in which Assembly participants called on parliaments of 
CIS countries to refrain from supporting separatist approaches 
in political and economic development of states. 
  Decrees were adopted in the military area on increasing 
defense capability, on cooperation, and on convergence of 
military legislation of CIS member states. The 
Interparliamentary Assembly addressed a proposal to all 
Commonwealth parliaments to make changes to legislative measures 
of their states and allow servicemen to continue to serve 
temporarily in other Commonwealth member states on the basis of 
bilateral agreements up to the year 2000. 
<H5>  4.2. Bodies Supporting Military Cooperation </H5>
  Multilateral cooperation of CIS member countries in the 
military area is carried out by two principal bodies, the 
Ministers of Defense Council and the Combined Armed Forces High 
Command (Diagram 5). 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UMA-005LC-35A>           Diagram 5. Organization of </FIG>





    The Ministers of Defense Council was formed in 
February 1992. In accordance with the decision made at that 
time, the Ministers of Defense Council was specified as the 
supreme collective body of the Heads of State Council in matters 
of defense policy and military organizational development of 
member states. Development of conceptual approaches to ensuring 
defense, proposals on the Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces 
organizational structure, and the procedure for Combined Armed 
Forces manpower acquisition were specified as among the most 
important functions of the Ministers of Defense Council. 
  The functions and prerogatives of the Ministers of Defense 
Council are specified by the CIS Charter and the Statute on the 
Ministers of Defense Council signed 22 January 1993. It includes 
ministers of defense (chairman of defense committee) of 
Commonwealth states and the CinC and Chief of Staff of the CIS 
Combined Armed Forces. 
  According to Article 30 of the CIS Charter the Ministers of 
Defense Council is a body of the Heads of State Council in 
matters of military policy and military organizational 
development. The following are among basic powers of the 
Ministers of Defense Council: consideration of conceptual 
approaches to ensuring defense and military security; and 
coordination of activity of ministers of defense (defense 
committees) of Commonwealth states in matters of military 
policy, military organizational development and military 
security. An important block of powers of the Ministers of 
Defense Council involves development of proposals on the makeup, 
organizational structure and purpose of the Combined Armed 
Forces; proposals on principles of their training, manpower 
acquisition and logistic support; proposals on requirements for 
appropriations to support activity of the High Command and 
Ministers of Defense Council; proposals on questions of 
Commonwealth states' nuclear policy; and development of draft 
multilateral treaties, agreements and other documents on matters 
of defense and legal regulation in the military policy area. 
  In addition, the Ministers of Defense Council works out 
proposals on fulfillment of obligations by Commonwealth states 
to support vital activities of the Combined Armed Forces; 
proposals on legal and social protection of servicemen, persons 
discharged from military service and members of their families; 
recommendations on military-mobilization assignments; 
recommendations on improving combat and mobilization readiness; 
and recommendations on organizing operational and combat 
training of Combined Armed Forces and the armed forces of 
Commonwealth states; and coordinates the development of arms, 
military equipment, and command and control systems and the 
operational preparation of territories of CIS member states. 
  Within limits of its competence the Ministers of Defense 
Council makes decisions on implementing treaties, agreements and 
other documents in the defense and military security area; 
coordinates fulfillment of international treaties in matters of 
armed forces reduction and disarmament; considers proposals on 
coordination of efforts aimed at preventing armed conflicts on 
territory of Commonwealth states and on their external borders; 
gives consent to the High Command for establishing military mass 
media; coordinates efforts to implement decisions of the Heads 
of State Council, Heads of Government Council and Ministers of 
Defense Council in matters of defense and military security; 
organizes supervision of their fulfillment; and performs other 
functions. 
  Sessions are the basic form of activity of the Ministers of 
Defense Council; they are held as necessary, but as a rule at 
least once every three months. Special sessions are convened by 
decision of the Commonwealth Heads of State Council and also at 
the proposal of at least one-third of the membership of the 
Ministers of Defense Council. 
  The Nuclear Policy Committee, the Statute on which 
was adopted in November 1992, is a collective working body of 
the Ministers of Defense Council. The Committee includes a 
chairman--CinC CIS Combined Armed Forces; deputy chairman--chief 
of staff of the CIS Combined Armed Forces; members--ministers of 
defense of Commonwealth states on whose territory nuclear 
weapons are stationed; and a secretary--chief of operations 
directorate of the CIS Combined Armed Forces Staff. 
  Nuclear Policy Committee functions include the following: 

  -  coordinating views on the role and place of nuclear 
weapons in the system of ensuring Commonwealth military 
security; 
  -  developing basic provisions of CIS nuclear policy; 
  -  assessing the world military-strategic situation and 
preparing 
proposals for heads of state and the Ministers of Defense 
Council on taking military security measures; 
  -  preparing proposals for using strategic nuclear forces; 
  -  coordinating efforts of Commonwealth states to comply with 
international understandings with respect to strategic nuclear 
forces, and so on. 
  Functioning of the Combined Armed Forces High 
Command is regulated by Statute and was placed into force 
by a Protocol signed by heads of Commonwealth states parties to 
the Collective Security Treaty of 9 October 1992. The Statute 
specifies the international law status of the High Command, its 
bodies and officials. 
  Its fundamental structure includes a command element made up 
of the CinC, chief of staff/first deputy CinC, deputy CinC, 
other officials, as well as a staff, secretariats, public 
information center, administrative directorate, committee on 
servicemen's rights, finance section and other bodies. 
  The following are the most important functions of the High 
Command: 

  -  analyzing the military-political and operational-strategic 
situation in the world and regions and briefing conclusions and 
proposals to supreme bodies of Commonwealth states and the 
Ministers of Defense Council; 
  -  directing the Combined Armed Forces, military observer teams 
and collective peacekeeping forces in the CIS; 
  -  preparing proposals on the reaction of Commonwealth states 
to a 
threat to peace or an act of aggression; 
  -  developing proposals for the Heads of State Council and 
Ministers of Defense Council on coordinating efforts aimed at 
preventing war and armed conflicts; 
  -  coordinating efforts of Commonwealth states to implement 
decisions of the Heads of State Council, Heads of Government 
Council, Collective Security Council and Ministers of Defense 
Council in defense matters; 
  -  preparing proposals and documents for decisionmaking by heads 
of states members of the Collective Security Council; 
  -  organizing interrelationships of the Collective Security 
Council with states, international organizations and the mass 
media, and carrying out coordination and cooperation with the 
North Atlantic Treaty Organization and other military-political 
groupings, blocs and alliances. 

    The High Command is called upon to assist and arrange help 
in 
establishing and strengthening armed forces of member states of 
the Collective Security Council and take part in monitoring 
compliance with international treaties with respect to strategic 
nuclear arms, in coordinating measures for ensuring nuclear 
security, in organizing joint exercises and command and staff 
games and military-scientific research, and in implementing 
guarantees for protection of rights, freedoms and interests of 
servicemen and their families. 
  Realization of these functions takes in the political, 
operational, organizational and administrative spheres. Tasks of 
all structural elements of the High Command were specified in 
accordance with this. 
  The CinC, chief of staff, deputy CinC, press secretary, 
Public Information Center, and Treaty and External Relations 
Section accomplish the immediate performance of tasks in the 
political sphere. In the operational sphere the chief tasks are 
performed by the Combined Armed Forces staff and the following 
committees: Chiefs of Staff, Military Organizational Development 
and Troop Training, Military-Technical, Manpower Acquisition and 
Cadres, and Logistic Support; and by other bodies. In the 
organizational sphere the main load rests on staff subunits 
which handle planning and organizational-mobilization work. 
Problems related to social-legal protection of servicemen and 
their families are resolved by the Committee on Servicemen's 
Rights. Tasks in the administrative sphere are assigned to the 
Administrative Directorate, Cadres Section, 
Administrative-Economic Section and Finance Section. 
  The CIS Combined Armed Forces staff is the command 
and control body of the High Command, a working body of the 
Chiefs of Staff Committee of Commonwealth States, and the 
supreme body for command and control of the Combined Armed 
Forces. It is made up of the chief of staff; his deputies, 
including permanent representatives of armed forces of 
Commonwealth states; committees and directorates; and 
independent sections and sectors. 
  The following are basic functions of the Combined Armed 
Forces staff: 

  -  analyzing the world military-political situation and 
status of international security; 
  -  developing proposals for the CinC on training and employment 
of 
the Combined Armed Forces, military observer teams and 
collective peacekeeping forces in the CIS; 
  -  fulfilling High Command functions as applied to strategic 
forces; 
  -  coordinating the planning and organization of measures aimed 
at 
ensuring mutual deliveries of arms, military equipment and other 
supplies; 
  -  placing military orders in scientific and industrial 
organizations of Commonwealth states; 
  -  participating in development of plans for augmenting 
mobilization reserves for the Combined Armed Forces with human 
and material resources; 
  -  participating in preparing proposals on draft legislative 
measures of Commonwealth states in matters of security, defense, 
performance of military service and social protection of 
servicemen and their families; 
  -  organizing and maintaining coordination of bodies for command 
and control of armed forces military intelligence; 
  -  planning and upgrading the staff automated command and 
control 
and communications system; 
  -  supporting the coordination of armed forces of Commonwealth 
states; 
  -  planning measures for logistic support and military transport 
movements of the Combined Armed Forces. 

    The Combined Armed Forces staff consists of two 
directorates--Operations and Organizational-Mobilization--as 
well as the Committee on Servicemen's Rights, and independent 
sectors: Information-Intelligence, Operational Rear and 
Transport Movements, Communications, Automated Command and 
Control and EW Systems, and Treaty and External Relations. 
  The Operations Directorate is assigned the following: 

  -  analyzing the operational-strategic situation in the world 
and individual regions, preparing proposals for the leadership 
of Commonwealth states on these matters and participating in 
development of international and national security problems; 
  -  developing proposals on military organizational development 
and 
preparation of states for defense; 
  -  planning measures for use of Combined Armed Forces and for 
assisting staffs of armed forces of the Commonwealth in matters 
of operational planning and the training of staffs and troops; 
  -  developing and organizing measures for preventing 
unsanctioned 
actions with nuclear weapons in the Combined Armed Forces, and 
monitoring their fulfillment; 
  -  developing proposals on effective 
combat strength of the CIS Combined Armed Forces and on a 
buildup of the infrastructure in theaters, and developing a plan 
of joint measures to be conducted on staffs and in troops of the 
Combined Armed Forces. 

    Functions of the Organizational-Mobilization Directorate 
include the following: 

  -  registering and keeping track of effective combat 
strength, stationing and numerical strength of troops 
transferred to operational subordination of the CIS Combined 
Armed Forces High Command; 
  -  coordinating organizational measures among ministries of 
defense (defense committee) of Commonwealth states with 
consideration of their proposals and coordinating deliveries of 
weapons and military equipment; 
  -  developing and coordinating documents prescribing standards 
concerning table of organization matters; 
  -  preparing calculations of the requirement for training cadets 
in higher educational institutions and officers and junior 
specialists in corresponding training institutions; 
  -  coordinating questions of mobilization deployment of 
strategic 
forces with ministries of defense of states and their placement 
in the highest conditions of combat readiness; 
  -  agreeing on and coordinating questions of placing orders for 
production of arms, equipment and ammunition among ministries of 
defense of Commonwealth states. 

    The Information-Intelligence Sector coordinates the activity 
of bodies for command and control of military intelligence of 
staffs of armed forces of the Commonwealth in the interests of 
information-intelligence support of the CIS Combined Armed 
Forces High Command. 
  The Communications and Automated Command and Control and EW 
Systems Sector is responsible for planning, organizing and 
providing communications to the CIS Combined Armed Forces staff 
and coordination communications among armed forces of 
Commonwealth states, and for combat and mobilization readiness 
of formations, units and establishments which are part of the 
Combined Armed Forces. In addition, this sector has 
responsibility for developing and implementing measures for 
ensuring communications security. 
  The Committee on Servicemen's Rights coordinates the 
resolution of problems of social protection of servicemen and 
their families. 
  The Treaty and External Relations Section is intended for 
organizing the High Command's international ties with military 
structures of foreign states. 
  In addition to authorized structures, a number of committees 
function on the staff on a nonpermanent basis: Chiefs of Staff 
Committee; Committee on Armed Forces Military Organizational 
Development and Training; Military-Technical Committee; Manpower 
Acquisition and Cadres Committee; and Logistic Support Committee. 
  Combined Armed Forces Chief of Staff Colonel General V. N. 
Samsonov is chairman of the Chiefs of Staff Committee; Combined 
Armed Forces First Deputy Chief of Staff Lieutenant General V. 
A. Krivonogikh is chairman of the Armed Forces Military 
Organizational Development and Training Committee; and 
Lieutenant General O. B. Shalimov, chief of the 
Organizational-Mobilization Directorate of the Combined Armed 
Forces staff, is chairman of the Manpower Acquisition and Cadres 
Committee. 
  A Public Information Center and Administrative Directorate 
function as independent bodies in the High Command (not a part 
of the staff). 
  The Public Information Center arranges information 
coordination in the Combined Armed Forces and in armed forces of 
the Commonwealth and provides for giving state bodies, public 
associations and the mass media official information, data and 
documents on problems of defense organizational development, 
collective security and day-to-day activity of the High Command, 
Commonwealth Ministers of Defense Council, and ministries [of 
defense] ([ defense] committee) of CIS member states; and 
organizes and coordinates the Combined Armed Forces High 
Command's ties with the public. 
  The Administrative Directorate organizes legal support to 
activity of the Ministers of Defense Council, Combined Armed 
Forces High Command and other plenipotentiary bodies of the 
Commonwealth in the collective security area, and the 
preparation of documents for sessions, conferences and other 
measures conducted by the Combined Armed Forces High Command and 
the CIS Ministers of Defense Council. 
  The High Command structure may undergo substantial changes 
in 
connection with upgrading of the collective security system and 
with a change in status and missions of coordination and command 
and control bodies. 
<H5>  4.3. International Military Cooperation </H5>
  The CIS Combined Armed Forces High Command performs a number 
of functions in the area of international military cooperation. 
As a permanently operating interstate coordinating working body 
of military command and control of the Heads of State Council, 
the CIS Combined Armed Forces High Command organizes and 
accomplishes interworking with state bodies and structures, 
military command and control bodies, international organizations 
and military-political alliances, and the mass media in the 
interests of strengthening mutual understanding and trust, 
developing cooperation, and fulfilling international obligations 
in the disarmament and security area. 
  Basic directions of this activity are connected with 
realization of decisions of Commonwealth leadership bodies on 
preventing war, maintaining stability and peace, using 
peacemaking forces, and creating reliable global, regional and 
national security mechanisms. 
  The focus of the High Command's attention is on questions of 
maintaining working contacts and broadening spheres of 
interworking with command and control bodies of national armed 
forces of Commonwealth member states and their official 
representatives. It has become a daily practice to mutually 
inform appropriate subunits and officials of the High Command, 
Combined Armed Forces Staff, ministries of defense (defense 
committee), staffs of armed forces of CIS states, and permanent 
representatives of these states on the Combined Armed Forces 
Staff (as of 1 July 1993 there were representatives of Armenia, 
Belarus, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Russian Federation, Tajikistan 
and Uzbekistan on the Combined Armed Forces Staff in the 
position of deputy chiefs of staff of the CIS Combined Armed 
Forces). Permanent representatives take part in sessions of the 
Chiefs of Staff Committee, Ministers of Defense Council and 
other measures. With their participation, a "roundtable 
discussion" was held in the High Command in March 1993 on 
problems and prospects of creating and upgrading the 
Commonwealth military security and collective defense system. 
  Permanent representatives take a direct part in preparing 
working documents for holding talks and signing multilateral and 
bilateral military cooperation agreements among Commonwealth 
states. 
  The CinC and other military officials of the CIS Combined 
Armed Forces regularly meet with ambassadors and senior 
diplomatic officials of Commonwealth member states accredited to 
the Russian Federation. During such meetings officials of 
diplomatic missions are informed of the views and positions of 
the High Command leadership on pressing problems and prospects 
for development of a collective security system and development 
of the Commonwealth Combined Armed Forces in international 
security structures on a regional and global scale. 
  Ambassadors of Commonwealth states in turn have an 
opportunity to set forth their views and vision of problems that 
arise and exchange opinions on matters of mutual interest. 
  Such meetings promote clarification and convergence of 
positions on matters relating to terms of reference of the High 
Command and to a strengthening of interworking and mutual 
understanding between political and military structures of 
Commonwealth states. 
  A methods conference of the leadership of these subunits 
held 
in the High Command in May 1993 laid down the foundation for 
further expanding the sphere of interworking and cooperation 
between external relations subunits of ministries of defense 
(defense committee) of CIS states and corresponding bodies of 
the High Command. It promoted the development of coordinated 
approaches to solving problems of military-diplomatic and 
representative activity under contemporary conditions. 
  Agreement was reached on holding regular conferences, 
working 
meetings, seminars and other measures with the involvement of 
representatives of external relations subunits for exchanging 
practical work experience in the area of development of 
international military cooperation, coordination of plans and 
programs, exchange visits along military lines, and training of 
officers traveling abroad as military attaches and their 
assistants. 
  In the period of the formation of armed forces in the CIS, 
cooperation in the external relations area with corresponding 
bodies of ministries of defense of Commonwealth states which do 
not yet have their own permanent representatives on the Combined 
Armed Forces staff is accomplished through officials of 
diplomatic missions accredited in the Russian Federation who are 
charged with handling military matters. 
  Realization of High Command initiatives for developing and 
deepening cooperation in the external relations area creates 
preconditions for a further joint search for ways of 
interworking which would help most to conclude basic measures 
for strengthening national armed forces of Commonwealth states 
and for jointly developing both the principles of forming and 
the mechanisms of using peacemaking forces, as well as 
developing conceptual approaches to building an effective 
collective security system. 
  Organizing contacts and ties with political, diplomatic, and 
military circles outside the Commonwealth, above all the United 
States and its North Atlantic Alliance allies, is a very 
important direction of High Command activity for developing 
external relations. Creation of CIS military and 
military-political structures drew fully natural interest after 
disintegration of the Warsaw Pact Organization and USSR and 
formation of the CIS. This interest extends to the objectives, 
missions, functions and organizational structure of the Combined 
Armed Forces High Command, limits of its powers and of its 
responsibility in the area of nuclear weapons control, and 
principles of CIS Combined Armed Forces organization, 
operational alignment, and interworking with the Commonwealth 
member states' national armed forces being established. 
  The radical change in the international situation was 
reflected in decisions of the December (1991) and then May 
(1992) NATO Council sessions, which marked the beginning of 
profound, large-scale restructuring of relations of CIS states 
with the North Atlantic Alliance and its member countries. 
Working meetings, press conferences and briefings during which 
foreign representatives were given maximum possible information 
regarding the full spectrum of problems and questions connected 
with creation and functions of the High Command and CIS Combined 
Armed Forces promoted a reciprocal movement toward establishing 
relations of partnership, openness and mutual respect. 
  Within limits of established powers and of certain 
additional 
functions of a political nature acquired because of the 
situation at hand, the High Command essentially was the only 
working body of the Heads of State Council for a certain period. 
It was in that capacity that it organized and performed its 
military-diplomatic activity. Legislative documents regulating 
this activity, including basic directions of the High Command's 
external relations, functions of corresponding subunits, and 
procedure for working with foreign military representatives 
accredited to the CIS Combined Armed Forces High Command, were 
developed in parallel. 
  The High Command Treaty and External Relations Sector and 
the 
Public Information Center were specified as High Command working 
bodies for supporting external relations. These bodies 
coordinate their practical activity with the Commonwealth 
Ministers of Defense Council Secretariat. 
  High Command accreditation of military representatives of 
foreign states from among military attaches assigned to those 
states' embassies in the Commonwealth was instituted by decision 
of the CIS Ministers of Defense Council to regulate the High 
Command's evolving contacts with the leadership of armed forces 
of foreign states and military-political alliances, to transfer 
them to a planned long-term basis, and to elevate the High 
Command's international law status. It does not affect the 
status, privileges and immunities of foreign military 
representatives nor give them a more favorable regime of 
presence in CIS states. 
  Within limits of its powers, the High Command is advancing 
initiatives and acting as an instrument for developing dialogue 
and partnership between the CIS and distant foreign states and 
military-political alliances. 
  Working meetings of Commander in Chief Marshal of Aviation 
Shaposhnikov with representatives of the supreme military 
leadership of NATO (Supreme Allied Commander Europe General J. 
Shalikashvili, Supreme Allied Commander Atlantic Admiral P. 
Miller and others) served to activate relationships of the CIS 
Combined Armed Forces High Command and NATO and confirmed that 
many coinciding viewpoints are seen in the parties' assessments 
and approaches. This goes for the situation taking shape in 
Europe and in the world, its development prospects, and 
possibilities of deepening international military cooperation 
and establishing a regional and global collective security 
system. 
  Meetings with WEU leaders, ministers of defense of a number 
of North Atlantic Alliance member states (United States, France, 
Norway, Denmark), and representatives of the U.S. Congress and 
the Norwegian Parliament were mutually beneficial. An expansion 
in the spectrum of such meetings, which are being held more and 
more often not only at the level of leaders, but also at the 
level of military attaches, working groups from NATO 
Headquarters, specialists in peacemaking operations, experts, 
officer associations, representatives of international relations 
institutes and so on, represents an unquestionably positive 
trend. 
  Development of external relations both in the area of 
cooperation with management bodies of ministries of defense 
(defense committee) of CIS member states and in the direction of 
building relations of partnership, equal rights and mutual 
advantages with distant foreign states will hold an important 
place in strengthening international stability, creating a CIS 
collective security system and ensuring its integral 
interrelationship with other international security systems and 
structures. 
<H5>  Contents of Full Version of `Security Through Cooperation-93' </H5>
  FOREWORD 1 
  PART 1 DEFENSE AND SECURITY IN CONTEMPORARY WORLD 5 
  1.1. Building the New World Order 5 
  1.2. Growing Ethnic-Cultural Differences 9 
  1.3. Growing Economic Interdependence of Nations 14 
  1.4. Progress of Science and Technology 17 
  1.5. Preserving Military Power as a Major Safeguard of 
National Interests 19 
  1.6. Growing Risk of Conflicts 26 
  PART 2 THE CIS--A NEW ARRANGEMENT OF COOPERATION OF 
SOVEREIGN 
NATIONS 28 
  2.1. The Making of the Commonwealth 28 
  2.2. Formation of Approaches to Collective Security and 
Cooperation of the CIS States in the Military Area 34 
  PART 3 THE OBJECTIVES AND PRINCIPLES OF MILITARY COOPERATION 
43 
  PART 4 THE MACHINERY OF MULTILATERAL COOPERATION IN THE CIS 
50 4.1. The CIS Coordination Bodies 
50 
  4.2. The Structures of Military Cooperation 58 
  4.3. International Military Cooperation 64 
  PART 5 THE COOPERATION OF THE CIS MEMBER COUNTRIES IN 
DEFENSE 
BUILDING 68 
  PART 6 STRATEGIC FORCES OF THE COMMONWEALTH--THE FACTOR OF 
INTERNATIONAL STABILITY 83 
  6.1. Goals and Objectives of Strategic Forces 83 
  6.2. Structure and Composition of the Strategic Forces of 
the CIS 85 
  6.2.1. International Agreements and Treaties on 
Strategic Nuclear Force Limitation and Reductions in 1970-1990 
88 
  6.2.2. Components of Strategic Forces 93 
  6.3. Command and Control of Strategic Forces 110 
  6.4. Prospects for Evolution of Strategic Forces of the 
CIS 111 6.5. Verification Over Nuclear Weapons 
Deployed in the CIS Territory 119 
  PART 7 ARMED FORCES OF STATES-SIGNATORIES TO THE ALMA-ATA 
DECLARATION 125 
  7.1. Armed Forces of the Republic of Armenia 125 
  7.2. Armed Forces of the Republic of Azerbaijan 136 
  7.3. Armed Forces of the Republic of Belarus 143 
  7.4. Armed Forces of the Republic of Kazakhstan 161 
  7.5. Armed Forces of the Republic of Kyrgyzstan 178 
  7.6. Armed Forces of the Republic of Moldova 189 
  7.7. Armed Forces of the Russian Federation 201 
  7.8. Armed Forces of the Republic of Tajikistan 242 
  7.9. Armed Forces of Turkmenistan 249 
  7.10. Armed Forces of Ukraine 253 
  7.11. Armed Forces of the Republic of Uzbekistan 283 
  ANNEXES 
  ANNEX 1 ARMED FORCES OF GEORGIA AND THE BALTIC NATIONS 
300 1.1. Armed Forces of the Republic 
of Georgia 300 
  1.2. Defense Forces of the Estonian Republic 304 
  1.3. Armed Forces of the Latvian Republic 309 
  1.4. Armed Forces of the Lithuanian Republic 317 
  ANNEX 2 DOCUMENTS OF TOP POLITICAL AND MILITARY LEADERS OF 
THE CIS 322 
  1. DOCUMENTS OF THE HEADS OF STATE OF THE CIS 322 
  1.1. DOCUMENTS OF THE HEADS OF THE NEW INDEPENDENT STATES 
ON CREATION AND FUNCTIONING OF THE CIS 322 
  1.1.1. The Agreement on the Creation of the CIS 
322 
  1.1.2. The Protocol to the Agreement on Creation of 
the CIS signed on December 8, 1991 in Minsk by Republic of 
Belarus, the Russian Federation (RSFSR) and Ukraine 325 
  1.1.3. The Alma-Ata Declaration 326 
  1.1.4. The Agreement on Coordination Institutions of 
the CIS 327 
  1.1.5. The Interim Agreement on the Heads of State 
Council and the Heads of Government Council of the CIS 327 
  1.1.6. The Declaration on Following the Principles of 
Cooperation Within Bounds of CIS 329 
  1.1.7. The Statement of Heads of the State CIS 
330 
  1.1.8. The Declaration on Non-Use of Force or Threat 
of Force in Mutual Relations Between the Member States of the 
CIS 330 
  1.1.9. The Agreement on the Authority of Supreme 
Bodies of the CIS on Defense Issues 331 
  1.1.10. The Charter of the CIS 334 
  1.1.11. The Decision on the Coordination-Consultative 
Committee of the CIS 340 
  1.1.12. Decision on the Executive Secretariat of the 
CIS 342 
  1.2. DOCUMENTS OF HEADS OF STATE OF THE CIS ON 
POLITICAL-MILITARY ISSUES 345 
  1.2.1. The Agreement on Joint Measures Concerning 
Nuclear Weapons 345 
  1.2.2. The Decision of Heads of State Council of CIS 
on Defense Ministers Council of the CIS 346 
  1.2.3. The Treaty of Collective Security 349 
  1.2.4. The Agreement on Adoption of the Statute on 
the Council of Collective Security 351 
  1.2.5. The Agreement on the Principles and Order of 
Fulfilling the Treaty on Conventional Armed Forces in Europe 
354 
  1.2.6. The JOINT STATEMENT of the Republic of 
Azerbaijan, the Republic of Armenia, the Republic of Belarus, 
the Republic of Kazakhstan, the Republic of Moldova, the Russian 
Federation, Ukraine and the Republic of Georgia in Connection 
with the Treaty on Conventional Armed Forces in Europe 361 
  1.2.7. The DECISION on Participation of 
States-Participants of the Commonwealth in the Treaty on 
Non-Proliferation of Nuclear Weapons 362 
  1.2.8. The DECISION on Participation of Member 
States of the CIS in the Treaty Between the USSR and USA on 
Elimination of Their Intermediate-Range Missiles and 
Smaller-Range Missiles 363 
  1.2.9. The DECISION on Participation of 
States-Participants of the CIS in the Treaty Between the Union 
of Soviet Socialist Republics and the United States of America 
on Limitation of Antimissile Defense Systems 363 
  1.2.10. The Protocol Decision on Strategic Forces 
364 
  1.2.11. The AGREEMENT on the Concept of Military 
Security of States-Participants of the CIS 364 
  1.3. DOCUMENTS OF HEADS OF STATE OF THE CIS ON MILITARY 
ISSUES 378 1.3.1. THE PROTOCOL OF THE 
CONFERENCE OF THE HEADS OF INDEPENDENT STATES 378 
  1.3.2. The Agreement of the Council of Heads of 
States-Parties to CIS on the Armed Forces and on the Border 
Guards 378 
  1.3.3. The Decision on the Supreme Command of the 
Joint Armed Forces of the CIS 379 
  1.3.4. The Agreement on Organization of the 
Activities of Supreme Command of the Joint Armed Forces of the 
CIS in Transitional Period 379 
  1.3.5. The Protocol on Putting in Force the Statute 
on the Supreme Command of Joint Armed Forces of the CIS 
381 
  1.3.6. The Agreement Between the Member States of the 
CIS on Strategic Forces 385 
  1.3.7. The Agreement Between the Member States of the 
CIS on the Status of the Strategic Forces 387 
  1.3.8. The Agreement Between Republic of Armenia, 
Republic of Belarus, Republic of Kazakhstan, Republic of 
Kyrgyzstan, the Russian Federation, Republic of Tajikistan, 
Turkmenistan and Republic of Uzbekistan on the General Purpose 
Forces for the Transitional Period 389 
  1.3.9. The Agreement between the Member States of the 
CIS on the Raising of Unified Defense Budget and on the 
Procedure of Financing the Armed Forces of the States of the 
Commonwealth 390 
  1.3.10. The Agreement Between the Member States of 
the CIS on Social and Legal Guarantees for Servicemen and Their 
Families, and also for Retired Ex-Servicemen and Their Families 
393 
  1.3.11. The Agreement on the Joint Armed Forces for 
Transitional Period 394 
  1.3.12. The Agreement on Legal Foundations of 
Activities of the Joint Armed Forces of the CIS 395 
  1.3.13. AGREEMENT on the Status of the General 
Purpose Forces, JAF, for the Transitional Period (Summary) 
396 
  1.3.14. AGREEMENT on the Principles of Manning and 
Military Service in JAFCIS (Summary) 396 
  1.3.15. AGREEMENT on the Principles of Supply of the 
Armed Forces of Member States of the Commonwealth with Armament, 
Equipment and Other Materiel, Organization of R&amp;D (Summary) 
397 
  1.3.16. The Agreement on the Groups of Military 
Observers and Collective Peacekeeping Forces in the CIS 
397 
  1.3.17. Agreement on Guarding of State Borders and 
Sea Economic Zones of States-Parties to the CIS 399 
  1.3.18. The Agreement on Procedures of Maintenance 
and Use of Space Infrastructure Facilities in the Interests of 
Fulfillment of Space Programs 401 
  1.3.19. The Protocol on the Status of Military 
Observers Groups and the Collective Peacekeeping Forces in the 
CIS 402 
  1.3.20. The Protocol on Manning, Structure, Logistic 
and Financial Support of Group of Military Observers and 
Collective Peacekeeping Forces in the CIS 404 
  1.3.21. The Agreement on the Principles of 
Recruiting, Training and Military Service of the Border Guards 
of the Commonwealth 406 
  1.3.22. The Agreement on the Principles of Providing 
of the Border Guards with Armaments, Military Hardware and Other 
Material Means, on Principles of Organization of Research and 
Development 408 
  1.3.23. Agreement on the Order of Pension Support for 
Servicemen of the Border Guards, Members of Their Families and 
State Insurance of Servicemen of the Border Guards of the Member 
States of the CIS 409 
  1.3.24. The Agreement on Means of Rocket Attack 
Warning System and of Space Control System 410 
  1.3.25. The Agreement on the Air Defense System 
413 
  1.3.26. The Decision on Establishment of the Council 
of Commanders of Border Guards 414 
  1.4. DOCUMENTS OF HEADS OF GOVERNMENT OF THE CIS 415 
  1.4.1. The Agreement on Training of Military Cadres 
415 
  1.4.2. The Agreement on Organization of Works for 
Interstate Standardization of Armaments and Military Equipment 
416 
  1.4.3. The Agreement on the Organization of 
Information Interaction in the JAFCIS and in the Armed Forces of 
States-Parties to the Agreement 417 
  1.4.4. Decision on Providing of 
Servicemen-Internationalists with Guaranteed Volume of 
Privileges and Medical and Social Support, Professional Training 
and Employment 419 
  1.5. DOCUMENTS OF THE DEFENSE MINISTERS COUNCIL OF THE 
CIS COUNTRIES 421 
  1.5.1. The Decision of the Defense Ministers Council 
of the States-Parties to the CIS on the Procedure for Mutual 
Transfer of Servicemen of the Armed Forces of the Commonwealth 
States 421 
  1.5.2. The Decision of the Defense Ministers Council 
of the CIS on Approval of Tentative Regulations of the Defense 
Ministers Council of the Commonwealth States 422 
  1.5.3. Decision of the Defense Ministers Council of 
the CIS on Approval of the Statute of the Board of the Joint 
Chiefs of Staff of the Armed Forces of the Commonwealth States 
424 
  1.5.4. The Protocol Decision of the Defense Ministers 
Council of the CIS on the Draft Statutes of Committees of the 
Supreme Command of the Joint Armed Forces of the CIS 425 
  1.5.5. The Decision of the Defense Ministers Council 
of the CIS on the Approval of the Statute of Deputies Chief of 
Staff of the Joint Armed Forces of the Commonwealth States 
425 
  1.6. DOCUMENTS OF THE INTERPARLIAMENTARY ASSEMBLY OF THE 
CIS MEMBER STATES 426 
  1.6.1. The Protocol of the Working Meeting of the 
Representatives of Supreme Soviets (Parliaments) of the Member 
States of the CIS 426 
  1.6.2. The Protocol of the Meeting of the Heads of 
the Supreme Soviets (Parliaments) of the Member States of the 
CIS on Interparliamentary Assembly of the Member States of the 
CIS and on Cooperation of Standing Commissions (Committees) of 
the Supreme Soviets (Parliaments) of the Member States of the 
CIS 427 
  1.6.3. The Agreement on Interparliamentary Assembly 
of the Member States of the CIS 428 
  1.6.4. Regulations of the Interparliamentary Assembly 
of the CIS Member States 430 
  1.6.5. The Decision of the Interparliamentary 
Assembly of the Member States of the CIS on Setting Up 
Committees of the Interparliamentary Assembly 434 
  1.6.6. The Address of the Interparliamentary Assembly 
to the Peoples, Parliaments of the CIS 434 
  1.6.7. The Address to the People of Tajikistan 
435 
  1.6.8. The Decision of the Interparliamentary 
Assembly of the Member States of the CIS on Implementation of 
Agreements and Preparation of Recommendation Acts on Defense 
435 
  1.6.9. Recommendations of the Interparliamentary 
Assembly of the Member States of the CIS on Social Guarantees 
for Persons Who Have Performed Military or Service Duty in 
Afghanistan and Other Countries in Which Combat Actions Took 
Place 436 
  1.6.10. The Regulation on the Interparliamentary 
Assembly of the Commonwealth Member States on the Formation of 
the Interparliamentary Assembly Committees' Staff 437 
  1.6.11. The Address of the Interparliamentary 
Assembly of the Member States of the CIS to the Heads of States 
in Relation with Situation in the Republic of Tajikistan 
438 
  1.6.12. The Decision of the Council of the 
Interparliamentary Assembly of the Member States of the CIS on 
Including Issue of Enhancing Defense Capabilities of the 
Commonwealth and Extending Cooperation in This Field in Agenda 
of the Third Plenary Meeting of the Interparliamentary Assembly 
438 
  1.6.13. The Decision of the Interparliamentary 
Assembly of the Member States of the CIS on Main Principles of 
Rapprochement of Military Law of the Member States of the CIS 
439 
  1.6.14. The Decision of the Interparliamentary 
Assembly of the Member States of the CIS on Provision for 
Defense Capabilities and Development of Cooperation in the 
Military Field 443 
  1.6.15. The Decision of the Interparliamentary 
Assembly of the Member States of the CIS on Social Guarantees 
for Persons Who Performed Military or Service Duty in 
Afghanistan or Other Countries in Which Combat Actions Took 
Place 444 
  1.6.16. The Decision of the Interparliamentary 
Assembly of the Member States of the CIS on Measures for 
Stabilization in the Republic of Tajikistan 445 
  1.6.17. The Decision of the Interparliamentary 
Assembly of Member States of the CIS on Temporary (Up to the 
Year of 2000) Permission To Continue Military Service in the 
Commonwealth Member States for Servicemen Having Other 
Citizenship 446 
  ANNEX 3 BIOGRAPHICAL SUMMARIES OF THE CIS TOP MILITARY 
OFFICIALS 449 
  INDEX 467 
  COPYRIGHT: Tsentr informatsionno-analiticheskogo 
obespecheniya gosudarstv Sodruzhestva, 1993 

